Book IV
Chapter 1
The Taming of Smeagol
 'Well, master, we're in a fix and no mistake,' said Sam Gamgee. He stood
despondently with hunched shoulders beside Frodo, and peered out with puckered
eyes into the gloom.
 It was the third evening since they had fled from the Company, as far as they could
tell: they had almost lost count of the hours during which they had climbed and
laboured among the barren slopes and stones of the Emyn Muil, sometimes
retracing their steps because they could find no way forward, sometimes discovering
that they had wandered in a circle back to where they had been hours before. Yet on
 136
the whole they had worked steadily eastward, keeping as near as they could find a
way to the outer edge of this strange twisted knot of hills. But always they found its
outward faces sheer, high and impassable, frowning over the plain below; beyond its
tumbled skirts lay livid festering marshes where nothing moved and not even a bird
was to be seen.
 The hobbits stood now on the brink of a tall cliff, bare and bleak, its feet wrapped in
mist; and behind them rose the broken highlands crowned with drifting cloud. A chill
wind' blew from the East. Night was gathering over the shapeless lands before them;
the sickly green of them was fading to a sullen brown. Far away to the right the
Anduin, that had gleamed fitfully in sun-breaks during the day, was now hidden in
shadow. But their eyes did not look beyond the River, back to Gondor, to their
friends, to the lands of Men. South and east they stared to where at the edge of the
oncoming night, a dark line hung, like distant mountains of motionless smoke. Every
now and again a tiny red gleam far away flickered upwards on the rim of earth and
sky.
 'What a fix!' said Sam. 'That's the one place in all the lands we've ever heard of
that we don't want to see any closer; and that's the one place we're trying to get to!
And that's just where we can't get, nohow. We've come the wrong way altogether,
seemingly. We can't get down; and if we did get down, we'd find all that green land a
nasty bog, I'll warrant. Phew! Can you smell it?' He sniffed at the wind.
 'Yes, I can smell it,' said Frodo, but he did not move, and his eyes remained fixed,
staring out towards the dark line and the flickering flame. 'Mordor!' he muttered under
his breath. 'If I must go there I wish I could come there quickly and make an end!' He
shuddered. The wind was chilly and yet heavy with an odour of cold decay. 'Well,' he
said, at last withdrawing his eyes, 'we cannot stay here all night, fix or no fix. We
must find a more sheltered spot, and camp once more; and perhaps another day will
show us a path.'
 'Or another and another and another,' muttered Sam. 'Or maybe no day. We've
come the wrong way.'
 'I wonder,' said Frodo. 'It's my doom, I think, to go to that Shadow yonder, so that a
way will be found. But will good or evil show it to me? What hope we had was in
speed. Delay plays into the Enemy's hands – and here I am: delayed. Is it the will of
the Dark Tower that steers us? All my choices have proved ill. I should have left the
Company long before, and come down from the North, east of the River and of the
Emyn Muil, and so over the hard of Battle Plain to the passes of Mordor. But now it
isn't possible for you and me alone to find a way back, and the Orcs are prowling on
the east bank. Every day that passes is a precious day lost. I am tired, Sam. I don't
know what is to be done. What food have we got left?'
 'Only those, what d'you call 'em, lembas, Mr. Frodo. A fair supply. But they are
better than naught, by a long bite. I never thought, though, when I first set tooth in
them, that I should ever come to wish for a change. But I do now: a bit of plain bread,
and a mug – aye, half a mug – of beer would go down proper. I've lugged my
cooking-gear all the way from the last camp, and what use has it been? Naught to
make a fire with, for a start; and naught to cook, not even grass!'
 They turned away and went down into a stony hollow. The westering sun was
caught into clouds, and night came swiftly. They slept as well as they could for the
cold, turn and turn about, in a nook among great jagged pinnacles of weathered
rock; at least they were sheltered from the easterly wind.
 'Did you see them again, Mr. Frodo?' asked Sam, as they sat, stiff and chilled,
munching wafers of lembas, in the cold grey of early morning.
 137
 'No,' said Frodo. 'I've heard nothing, and seen nothing, for two nights now.'
 'Nor me,' said Sam. 'Grrr! Those eyes did give me a turn! But perhaps we've
shaken him off at last, the miserable slinker. Gollum! I'll give him gollum in his throat,
if ever I get my hands on his neck.'
 'I hope you'll never need to,' said Frodo. 'I don't know how he followed us; but it
may be that he's lost us again, as you say. In this dry bleak land we can't leave many
footprints, nor much scent, even for his snuffling nose.'
 'I hope that's the way of it,' said Sam. 'I wish we could be rid of him for good!'
 'So do I,' said Frodo, 'but he's not my chief trouble. I wish we could get away from
these hills! I hate them. I feel all naked on the east side, stuck up here with nothing
but the dead flats between me and that Shadow yonder. There's an Eye in it. Come
on! We've got to get down today somehow.'
 But that day wore on, and when afternoon faded towards evening they were still
scrambling along the ridge and had found no way of escape.
 Sometimes in the silence of that barren country they fancied that they heard faint
sounds behind them, a stone falling, or the imagined step of flapping feet on the
rock. But if they halted and stood still listening, they heard no more, nothing but the
wind sighing over the edges of the stones – yet even that reminded them of breath
softly hissing through sharp teeth.
 All that day the outer ridge of the Emyn Muil had been bending gradually
northward, as they struggled on. Along its brink there now stretched a wide tumbled
flat of scored and weathered rock, cut every now and again by trench-like gullies that
sloped steeply down to deep notches in the cliff-face. To find a path in these clefts,
which were becoming deeper and more frequent, Frodo and Sam were driven to
their left, well away from the edge, and they did not notice that for several miles they
had been going slowly but steadily downhill: the cliff-top was sinking towards the
level of the lowlands.
 At last they were brought to a halt. The ridge took a sharper bend northward and
was gashed by a deeper ravine. On the further side it reared up again, many
fathoms at a single leap: a great grey cliff loomed before them, cut sheer down as if
by a knife stroke. They could go no further forwards, and must turn now either west
or east. But west would lead them only into more labour and delay, back towards the
heart of the hills; east would take them to the outer precipice.
 'There's nothing for it but to scramble down this gully, Sam,' said Frodo. 'Let's see
what it leads to!'
 'A nasty drop, I'll bet,' said Sam.
 The cleft was longer and deeper than it seemed. Some way down they found a few
gnarled and stunted trees, the first they had seen for days: twisted birch for the most
part, with here and there a fir-tree. Many were dead and gaunt, bitten to the core by
the eastern winds. Once in milder days there must have been a fair thicket in the
ravine, but now, after some fifty yards, the trees came to an end, though old broken
stumps straggled on almost to the cliff's brink. The bottom of the gully, which lay
along the edge of a rock-fault, was rough with broken stone and slanted steeply
down. When they came at last to the end of it, Frodo stooped and leaned out.
 'Look!' he said. 'We must have come down a long way, or else the cliff has sunk.
It's much lower here than it was, and it looks easier too.'
 Sam knelt beside him and peered reluctantly over the edge. Then he glanced up at
the great cliff rising up, away on their left. 'Easier!' he grunted. 'Well, I suppose it's
always easier getting down than up. Those as can't fly can jump!'
 'It would be a big jump still,' said Frodo. 'About, well' – he stood for a moment
 138
measuring it with his eyes – 'about eighteen fathoms I should guess. Not more.'
 'And that's enough!' said Sam. 'Ugh! How I do hate looking down from a height! But
looking's better than climbing.'
 'All the same,' said Frodo, 'I think we could climb here; and I think we shall have to
try. See – the rock is quite different from what it was a few miles back. It has slipped
and cracked.'
 The outer fall was indeed no longer sheer, but sloped outwards a little. It looked
like a great rampart or sea-wall whose foundations had shifted, so that its courses
were all twisted and disordered, leaving great fissures and long slanting edges that
were in places almost as wide as stairs.
 'And if we're going to try and get down, we had better try at once. It's getting dark
early. I think there's a storm coming.'
 The smoky blur of the mountains in the East was lost in a deeper blackness that
was already reaching out westwards with long arms. There was a distant mutter of
thunder borne on the rising breeze. Frodo sniffed the air and looked up doubtfully at
the sky. He strapped his belt outside his cloak and tightened it, and settled his light
pack on his back; then he stepped towards the edge. 'I'm going to try it,' he said.
 'Very good!' said Sam gloomily. 'But I'm going first.'
 'You?' said Frodo. 'What's made you change your mind about climbing?'
 'I haven't changed my mind. But it's only sense: put the one lowest as is most likely
to slip. I don't want to come down atop of you and knock you off no sense in killing
two with one fall.'
 Before Frodo could stop him, he sat down, swung his legs over the brink, and
twisted round, scrabbling with his toes for a foothold. It is doubtful if he ever did
anything braver in cold blood, or more unwise.
 'No, no! Sam, you old ass!' said Frodo. 'You'll kill yourself for certain going over like
that without even a look to see what to make for. Come back!' He took Sam under
the armpits and hauled him up again. 'Now, wait a bit and be patient!' he said. Then
he lay on the ground, leaning out and looking down: but the light seemed to be
fading quickly, although the sun had not yet set. 'I think we could manage this,' he
said presently. 'I could at any rate; and you could too. if you kept your head and
followed me carefully.'
 'I don't know how you can be so sure,' said Sam. 'Why! You can't see to the bottom
in this light. What if you comes to a place where there's nowhere to put your feet or
your hands?'
 'Climb back, I suppose,' said Frodo.
 'Easy said,' objected Sam. 'Better wait till morning and more light.'
 'No! Not if I can help it,' said Frodo with a sudden strange vehemence. 'I grudge
every hour, every minute. I'm going down to try it out. Don't you follow till I come
back or call!'
 Gripping the stony lip of the fall with his fingers he let himself gently down, until
when his arms were almost at full stretch, his toes found a ledge. 'One step down!'
he said. 'And this ledge broadens out to the right. I could stand there without a hold.
I'll–' his words were cut short.
 The hurrying darkness, now gathering great speed, rushed up from the East and
swallowed the sky. There was a dry splitting crack of thunder right overhead. Searing
lightning smote down into the hills. Then came a blast of savage wind, and with it,
mingling with its roar, there came a high shrill shriek. The hobbits had heard just
such a cry far away in the Marish as they fled from Hobbiton, and even there in the
woods of the Shire it had frozen their blood. Out here in the waste its terror was far
 139
greater: it pierced them with cold blades of horror and despair, stopping heart and
breath. Sam fell flat on his face. Involuntarily Frodo loosed his hold and put his
hands over his head and ears. He swayed, slipped, and slithered downwards with a
wailing cry.
 Sam heard him and crawled with an effort to the edge. 'Master, master!' he called.
'Master!'.
 He heard no answer. He found he was shaking all over, but he gathered his
breath, and once again he shouted: 'Master!' The wind seemed to blow his voice
back into his throat, but as it passed, roaring up the gully and away over the hills, a
faint answering cry came to his ears:
 'All right, all right! I'm here. But I can't see.'
 Frodo was calling with a weak voice. He was not actually very far away. He had
slid and not fallen, and had come up with a jolt to his feet on a wider ledge not many
yards lower down. Fortunately the rock-face at this point leaned well back and the
wind had pressed him against the cliff, so that he had not toppled over. He steadied
himself a little, laying his face against the cold stone, feeling his heart pounding. But
either the darkness had grown complete, or else his eyes had lost their sight. All was
black about him. He wondered if he had been struck blind. He took a deep breath.
 'Come back! Come back!' he heard Sam's voice out of the blackness above.
 'I can't,' he said. 'I can't see. I can't find any hold. I can't move yet.'
 'What can I do, Mr. Frodo? What can I do?' shouted Sam, leaning out dangerously
far. Why could not his master see? It was dim, certainly, but not as dark as all that.
He could see Frodo below him, a grey forlorn figure splayed against the cliff. But he
was far out of the reach of any helping hand.
 There was another crack of thunder; and then the rain came. In a blinding sheet,
mingled with hail, it drove against the cliff, bitter cold.
 'I'm coming down to you,' shouted Sam, though how he hoped to help in that way
he could not have said.
 'No, no! wait!' Frodo called back, more strongly now. 'I shall be better soon. I feel
better already. Wait! You can't do anything without a rope.'
 'Rope!' cried Sam, talking wildly to himself in his excitement and relief. 'Well, if I
don't deserve to be hung on the end of one as a warning to numbskulls! You're nowt
but a ninnyhammer, Sam Gamgee: that's what the Gaffer said to me often enough, it
being a word of his. Rope!'
 'Stop chattering!' cried Frodo, now recovered enough to feel both amused and
annoyed. 'Never mind your Gaffer! Are you trying to tell yourself you've got some
rope in your pocket? If so, out with it!
 'Yes, Mr. Frodo, in my pack and all. Carried it hundreds of miles and I'd clean
forgotten it!'
 'Then get busy and let an end down!'
 Quickly Sam unslung his pack and rummaged in it. There indeed at the bottom
was a coil of the silken-grey rope made by the folk of Lorien. He cast an end to his
master. The darkness seemed to lift from Frodo's eyes, or else his sight was
returning. He could see the grey line as it came dangling down, and he thought it had
a faint silver sheen. Now that he had some point in the darkness to fix his eyes on,
he felt less giddy. Leaning his weight forward, he made the end fast round his waist,
and then he grasped the line with both hands.
 Sam stepped back and braced his feet against a stump a yard or two from the
edge. Half hauled, half scrambling, Frodo came up and threw himself on the ground.
 Thunder growled and rumbled in the distance, and the rain was still falling heavily.
 140
The hobbits crawled away back into the gully; but they did not find much shelter
there. Rills of water began to run down; soon they grew to a spate that splashed and
fumed on the stones, and spouted out over the cliff like the gutters of a vast roof.
 'I should have been half drowned down there, or washed clean off,' said Frodo.
'What a piece of luck you had that rope!'
 'Better luck if I'd thought of it sooner,' said Sam. 'Maybe you remember them
putting the ropes in the boats, as we started off: in the elvish country. I took a fancy
to it, and I stowed a coil in my pack. Years ago, it seems. "It may be a help in many
needs," he said: Haldir, or one of those folk. And he spoke right.'
 'A pity I didn't think of bringing another length,' said Frodo, 'but I left the Company
in such a hurry and confusion. If only we had enough we could use it to get down.
How long is your rope, I wonder?'
 Sam paid it out slowly, measuring it with his arms: 'Five, ten, twenty, thirty ells,
more or less,' he said.
 'Who'd have thought it!' Frodo exclaimed.
 'Ah! Who would?' said Sam. 'Elves are wonderful folk. It looks a bit thin, but it's
tough; and soft as milk to the hand. Packs close too, and as light as light. Wonderful
folk to be sure!'
 'Thirty ells!' said Frodo considering. 'I believe it would be enough. If the storm
passes before nightfall, I'm going to try it.'
 'The rain's nearly given over already,' said Sam; 'but don't you go doing anything
risky in the dim again, Mr. Frodo! And I haven't got over that shriek on the wind yet, if
you have. Like a Black Rider it sounded – but one up in the air, if they can fly. I'm
thinking we'd best lay up in this crack till night's over.'
 'And I'm thinking that I won't spend a moment longer than I need stuck up on this
edge with the eyes of the Dark Country looking over the marshes,' said Frodo.
 With that he stood up and went down to the bottom of the gully again. He looked
out. Clear sky was growing in the East once more. The skirts of the storm were
lifting, ragged and wet, and the main battle had passed to spread its great wings
over the Emyn Muil; upon which the dark thought of Sauron brooded for a while.
Thence it turned, smiting the Vale of Anduin with hail and lightning, and casting its
shadow upon Minas Tirith with threat of war. Then, lowering in the mountains, and
gathering its great spires, it rolled on slowly over Gondor and the skirts of Rohan,
until far away the Riders on the plain saw its black towers moving behind the sun, as
they rode into the West. But here, over the desert and the reeking marshes the deep
blue sky of evening opened once more, and a few pallid stars appeared, like small
white holes in the canopy above the crescent moon.
 'It's good to be able to see again,' said Frodo, breathing deep. 'Do you know, I
thought for a bit that I had lost my sight? From the lightning or something else worse.
I could see nothing, nothing at all, until the grey rope came down. It seemed to
shimmer somehow.'
 'It does look sort of silver in the dark,' said Sam. 'Never noticed it before, though I
can't remember as I've ever had it out since I first stowed it. But if you're so set on
climbing, Mr. Frodo, how are you going to use it? Thirty ells, or say, about eighteen
fathom: that's no more than your guess at the height of the cliff.'
 Frodo thought for a while. 'Make it fast to that stump, Sam!' he said. 'Then I think
you shall have your wish this time and go first. I'll lower you, and you need do no
more than use your feet and hands to fend yourself off the rock. Though, if you put
your weight on some of the ledges and give me a rest, it will help. When you're
down, I'll follow. I feel quite myself again now.'
 141
 'Very well,' said Sam heavily. 'If it must be, let's get it over!' He took up the rope
and made it fast over the stump nearest to the brink; then the other end he tied about
his own waist. Reluctantly he turned and prepared to go over the edge a second
time.
 It did not, however, turn out half as bad as he had expected. The rope seemed to
give him confidence, though he shut his eyes more than once when he looked down
between his feet. There was one awkward spot, where there was no ledge and the
wall was sheer and even undercut for a short space; there he slipped and swung out
on the silver line. But Frodo lowered him slowly and steadily, and it was over at last.
His chief fear had been that the rope-length would give out while he was still high up,
but there was still a good bight in Frodo's hands, when Sam came to the bottom and
called up: 'I'm down!' His voice came up clearly from below, but Frodo could not see
him; his grey elven-cloak had melted into the twilight.
 Frodo took rather more time to follow him. He had the rope about his waist and it
was fast above, and he had shortened it so that it would pull him up before he
reached the ground; still he did not want to risk a fall, and he had not quite Sam's
faith in this slender grey line. He found two places, all the same, where he had to
trust wholly to it: smooth surfaces where there was no hold even for his strong hobbit
fingers and the ledges were far apart. But at last he too was down.
 'Well!' he cried. 'We've done it! We've escaped from the Emyn Muil! And now what
next, I wonder? Maybe we shall soon be sighing for good hard rock under foot
again.'
 But Sam did not answer: he was staring back up the cliff. 'Ninnyhammers!' he said.
'Noodles! My beautiful rope! There it is tied to a stump, and we're at the bottom. Just
as nice a little stair for that slinking Gollum as we could leave. Better put up a
signpost to say which way we've gone! I thought it seemed a bit too easy.'
 'If you can think of any way we could have both used the rope and yet brought it
down with us, then you can pass on to me ninnyhammer, or any other name your
Gaffer gave you,' said Frodo. 'Climb up and untie it and let yourself down, if you want
to!'
 Sam scratched his head. 'No, I can't think how, begging your pardon,' he said. 'But
I don't like leaving it, and that's a fact.' He stroked the rope's end and shook it gently.
'It goes hard parting with anything I brought out of the Elf-country. Made by Galadriel
herself, too, maybe. Galadriel,' he murmured nodding his head mournfully. He looked
up and gave one last pull to the rope as if in farewell.
 To the complete surprise of both the hobbits it came loose. Sam fell over, and the
long grey coils slithered silently down on top of him. Frodo laughed. 'Who tied the
rope?' he said. 'A good thing it held as long as it did! To think that I trusted all my
weight to your knot!'
 Sam did not laugh. 'I may not be much good at climbing, Mr. Frodo,' he said in
injured tones, 'but I do know something about rope and about knots. It's in the family,
as you might say. Why, my grand-dad, and my uncle Andy after him, him that was
the Gaffer's eldest brother he had a rope-walk over by Tighfield many a year. And I
put as fast a hitch over the stump as any one could have done, in the Shire or out of
it.'
 'Then the rope must have broken – frayed on the rock-edge, I expect,' said Frodo.
 'I bet it didn't!' said Sam in an even more injured voice. He stooped and examined
the ends. 'Nor it hasn't neither. Not a strand!'
 'Then I'm afraid it must have been the knot,' said Frodo.
 Sam shook his head and did not answer. He was passing the rope through his
 142
fingers thoughtfully. 'Have it your own way, Mr. Frodo,' he said at last, 'but I think the
rope came off itself – when I called.' He coiled it up and stowed it lovingly in his pack.
 'It certainly came,' said Frodo, 'and that's the chief thing. But now we've got to think
of our next move. Night will be on us soon. How beautiful the stars are, and the
Moon!'
 'They do cheer the heart, don't they?' said Sam looking up. 'Elvish they are.
somehow. And the Moon's growing. We haven't seen him for a night or two in this
cloudy weather. He's beginning to give quite a light.'
 'Yes,' said Frodo, 'but he won't be full for some days. I don't think we'll try the
marshes by the light of half a moon.'
 Under the first shadows of night they started out on the next stage of their journey.
After a while Sam turned and looked back at the way they had come. The mouth of
the gully was a black notch in the dim cliff. 'I'm glad we've got the rope,' he said.
'We've set a little puzzle for that footpad, anyhow. He can try his nasty flappy feet on
those ledges!'
 They picked their steps away from the skirts of the cliff, among a wilderness of
boulders and rough stones, wet and slippery with the heavy rain. The ground still fell
away sharply. They had not gone very far when they came upon a great fissure that
yawned suddenly black before their feet. It was not wide, but it was too wide to jump
across in the dim light. They thought they could hear water gurgling in its depths. It
curved away on their left northward, back towards the hills, and so barred their road
in that direction, at any rate while darkness lasted.
 'We had better try a way back southwards along the line of the cliff, I think,' said
Sam. 'We might find some nook there, or even a cave or something.'
 'I suppose so,' said Frodo. 'I'm tired, and I don't think I can scramble among stones
much longer tonight – though I grudge the delay. I wish there was a clear path in
front of us: then I'd go on till my legs gave way.'
 They did not find the going any easier at the broken feet of the Emyn Muil. Nor did
Sam find any nook or hollow to shelter in: only bare stony slopes frowned over by the
cliff, which now rose again, higher and more sheer as they went back. In the end,
worn out, they just cast themselves on the ground under the lee of a boulder lying
not far from the foot of the precipice. There for some time they sat huddled
mournfully together in the cold stony night, while sleep crept upon them in spite of all
they could do to hold it off. The moon now rode high and clear. Its thin white light lit
up the faces of the rocks and drenched the cold frowning walls of the cliff, turning all
the wide looming darkness into a chill pale grey scored with black shadows.
 'Well!' said Frodo, standing up and drawing his cloak more closely round him. 'You
sleep for a bit Sam and take my blanket. I'll walk up and down on sentry for a while.'
Suddenly he stiffened, and stooping he gripped Sam by the arm. 'What's that?' he
whispered. 'Look over there on the cliff!'
 Sam looked and breathed in sharply through his teeth. 'Ssss!' he said. 'That's what
it is. It's that Gollum! Snakes and ladders! And to think that I thought that we'd puzzle
him with our bit of a climb! Look at him! Like a nasty crawling spider on a wall.'
 Down the face of a precipice, sheer and almost smooth it seemed in the pale
moonlight, a small black shape was moving with its thin limbs splayed out. Maybe its
soft clinging hands and toes were finding crevices and holds that no hobbit could
ever have seen or used, but it looked as if it was just creeping down on sticky pads,
like some large prowling thing of insect-kind. And it was coming down head first, as if
it was smelling its way. Now and again it lifted its head slowly, turning it right back on
its long skinny neck, and the hobbits caught a glimpse of two small pale gleaming
 143
lights, its eyes that blinked at the moon for a moment and then were quickly lidded
again.
 'Do you think he can see us?' said Sam.
 'I don't know,' said Frodo quietly, 'but I think not. It is hard even for friendly eyes to
see these elven-cloaks: I cannot see you in the shadow even at a few paces. And
I've heard that he doesn't like Sun or Moon.'
 'Then why is he coming down just here?' asked Sam.
 'Quietly, Sam!' said Frodo. 'He can smell us, perhaps. And he can hear as keen as
Elves, I believe. I think he has heard something now: our voices probably. We did a
lot of shouting away back there; and we were talking far too loudly until a minute
ago.'
 'Well, I'm sick of him,' said Sam. 'He's come once too often for me and I'm going to
have a word with him, if I can. I don't suppose we could give him the slip now
anyway.' Drawing his grey hood well over his face, Sam crept stealthily towards the
cliff.
 'Careful!' whispered Frodo coming behind. 'Don't alarm him! He's much more
dangerous than he looks.'
 The black crawling shape was now three-quarters of the way down, and perhaps
fifty feet or less above the cliff's foot. Crouching stone-still in the shadow of a large
boulder the hobbits watched him. He seemed to have come to a difficult passage or
to be troubled about something. They could hear him snuffling, and now and again
there was a harsh hiss of breath that sounded like a curse. He lifted his head, and
they thought they heard him spit. Then he moved on again. Now they could hear his
voice creaking and whistling.
 'Ach, sss! Cautious, my precious! More haste less speed. We musstn't rissk our
neck, musst we, precious? No, precious – gollum!' He lifted his head again, blinked
at the moon, and quickly shut his eyes. 'We hate it,' he hissed. 'Nassty, nassty
shivery light it is – sss – it spies on us, precious – it hurts our eyes.'
 He was getting lower now and the hisses became sharper and clearer. 'Where iss
it, where iss it: my Precious, my Precious? It's ours, it is, and we wants it. The
thieves, the thieves, the filthy little thieves. Where are they with my Precious? Curse
them! We hates them.'
 'It doesn't sound as if he knew we were here, does it?' whispered Sam. 'And what's
his Precious? Does he mean the-'
 'Hsh!' breathed Frodo. 'He's getting near now, near enough to hear a whisper.'
 Indeed Gollum had suddenly paused again, and his large head on its scrawny
neck was lolling from side to side as if he was listening. His pale eyes were half
unlidded. Sam restrained himself, though his fingers were twitching. His eyes, filled
with anger and disgust, were fixed on the wretched creature as he now began to
move again, still whispering and hissing to himself.
 At last he was no more than a dozen feet from the ground, right above their heads.
From that point there was a sheer drop, for the cliff was slightly undercut, and even
Gollum could not find a hold of any kind. He seemed to be trying to twist round, so as
to go legs first, when suddenly with a shrill whistling shriek he fell. As he did so, he
curled his legs and arms up round him, like a spider whose descending thread is
snapped.
 Sam was out of his hiding in a flash and crossed the space between him and the
cliff foot in a couple of leaps. Before Gollum could get up, he was on top of him. But
he found Gollum more than he bargained for, even taken like that, suddenly, off his
guard after a fall. Before Sam could get a hold, long legs and arms were wound
 144
round him pinning his arms, and a clinging grip, soft but horribly strong, was
squeezing him like slowly tightening cords; clammy fingers were feeling for his
throat. Then sharp teeth bit into his shoulder. All he could do was to butt his hard
round head sideways into the creature's face. Gollum hissed and spat, but he did not
let go.
 Things would have gone ill with Sam, if he had been alone. But Frodo sprang up,
and drew Sting from its sheath. With his left hand he drew back Gollum's head by his
thin lank hair, stretching his long neck, and forcing his pale venomous eyes to stare
up at the sky.
 'Let go! Gollum,' he said. 'This is Sting. You have seen it before once upon a time.
Let go, or you'll feel it this time! I'll cut your throat.'
 Gollum collapsed and went as loose as wet string. Sam got up, fingering his
shoulder. His eyes smouldered with anger, but he could not avenge himself: his
miserable enemy lay grovelling on the stones whimpering.
 'Don't hurt us! Don't let them hurt us, precious! They won't hurt us will they, nice
little hobbitses? We didn't mean no harm, but they jumps on us like cats on poor
mices, they did, precious. And we're so lonely, gollum. We'll be nice to them, very
nice, if they'll be nice to us, won't we, yes, yess.'
 'Well, what's to be done with it?' said Sam. 'Tie it up, so as it can't come sneaking
after us no more, I say.'
 'But that would kill us, kill us,' whimpered Gollum. 'Cruel little hobbitses. Tie us up
in the cold hard lands and leave us, gollum, gollum.' Sobs welled up in his gobbling
throat.
 'No,' said Frodo. 'If we kill him, we must kill him outright. But we can't do that, not
as things are. Poor wretch! He has done us no harm.'
 'Oh hasn't he!' said Sam rubbing his shoulder. 'Anyway he meant to, and he means
to, I'll warrant. Throttle us in our sleep, that's his plan.'
 'I daresay,' said Frodo. 'But what he means to do is another matter.' He paused for
a while in thought. Gollum lay still, but stopped whimpering. Sam stood glowering
over him.
 It seemed to Frodo then that he heard, quite plainly but far off, voices out of the
past:
 What a pity Bilbo did not stub the vile creature, when he had a chance!
 145
 Pity? It was Pity that stayed his hand. Pity, and Mercy: not to strike without need.
 I do not feel any pity for Gollum. He deserves death.
 Deserves death! I daresay he does. Many that live deserve death. And some die
that deserve life. Can you give that to them? Then be not too eager to deal out death
in the name of justice, fearing for your own safety. Even the wise cannot see all
ends.
 'Very well,' he answered aloud, lowering his sword. 'But still I am afraid. And yet, as
you see, I will not touch the creature. For now that I see him, I do pity him.'
 Sam stared at his master, who seemed to be speaking to some one who was not
there. Gollum lifted his head.
 'Yess, wretched we are, precious,' he whined. 'Misery misery! Hobbits won't kill us,
nice hobbits.'
 'No, we won't,' said Frodo. 'But we won't let you go, either. You're full of
wickedness and mischief, Gollum. You will have to come with us, that's all, while we
keep an eye on you. But you must help us, if you can. One good turn deserves
another.'
 'Yess, yes indeed,' said Gollum sitting up. 'Nice hobbits! We will come with them.
Find them safe paths in the dark, yes we will. And where are they going in these cold
hard lands, we wonders, yes we wonders?' He looked up at them, and a faint light of
cunning and eagerness flickered for a second in his pale blinking eyes.
 Sam scowled at him, and sucked his teeth; but he seemed to sense that there was
something odd about his master's mood and that the matter was beyond argument.
All the same he was amazed at Frodo's reply.
 Frodo looked straight into Gollum's eyes which flinched and twisted away. 'You
know that, or you guess well enough, Smeagol,' he said quietly and sternly. 'We are
going to Mordor, of course. And you know the way there, I believe.'
 'Ach! sss!' said Gollum, covering his ears with his hands, as if such frankness, and
the open speaking of the names, hurt him. 'We guessed, yes we guessed,' he
whispered; 'and we didn't want them to go, did we? No, precious, not the nice
hobbits. Ashes, ashes, and dust, and thirst there is; and pits, pits, pits, and Orcs,
thousands of Orcses. Nice hobbits mustn't go to – sss – those places.'
 'So you have been there?' Frodo insisted. 'And you're being drawn back there,
aren't you?'
 'Yess. Yess. No!' shrieked Gollum. 'Once, by accident it was, wasn't it, precious?
Yes, by accident. But we won't go back, no, no!' Then suddenly his voice and
language changed, and he sobbed in his throat, and spoke but not to them. 'Leave
me alone, gollum! You hurt me. O my poor hands, gollum! I, we, I don't want to come
back. I can't find it. I am tired. I, we can't find it, gollum, gollum, no, nowhere. They're
always awake. Dwarves, Men, and Elves, terrible Elves with bright eyes. I can't find
it. Ach!' He got up and clenched his long hand into a bony fleshless knot, shaking it
towards the East. 'We won't!' he cried. 'Not for you.' Then he collapsed again.
'Gollum, gollum,' he whimpered with his face to the ground. 'Don't look at us! Go
away! Go to sleep!'
 'He will not go away or go to sleep at your command, Smeagol,' said Frodo. 'But if
you really wish to be free of him again. then you must help me. And that I fear means
finding us a path towards him. But you need not go all the way, not beyond the gates
of his land.'
 Gollum sat up again and looked at him under his eyelids. 'He's over there,' he
cackled. 'Always there. Orcs will take you all the way. Easy to find Orcs east of the
River. Don't ask Smeagol. Poor, poor Smeagol, he went away long ago. They took
 146
his Precious, and he's lost now.'
 'Perhaps we'll find him again, if you come with us,' said Frodo.
 'No, no, never! He's lost his Precious,' said Gollum.
 'Get up!' said Frodo.
 Gollum stood up and backed away against the cliff.
 'Now!' said Frodo. 'Can you find a path easier by day or by night? We're tired; but if
you choose the night, we'll start tonight.'
 'The big lights hurt our eyes, they do,' Gollum whined. 'Not under the White Face,
not yet. It will go behind the hills soon, yess. Rest a bit first, nice hobbits!'
 'Then sit down,' said Frodo, 'and don't move!'
 The hobbits seated themselves beside him, one on either side. with their backs to
the stony wall, resting their legs. There was no need for any arrangement by word:
they knew that they must not sleep for a moment. Slowly the moon went by.
Shadows fell down from the hills, and all grew dark before them. The stars grew thick
and bright in the sky above. No one stirred. Gollum sat with his legs drawn up, knees
under chin, flat hands and feet splayed on the ground, his eyes closed; but he
seemed tense, as if thinking or listening.
 Frodo looked across at Sam. Their eyes met and they understood. They relaxed,
leaning their heads back, and shutting their eyes or seeming to. Soon the sound of
their soft breathing could be heard. Gollum's hands twitched a little. Hardly
perceptibly his head moved to the left and the right, and first one eye and then the
other opened a slit. The hobbits made no sign.
 Suddenly, with startling agility and speed, straight off the ground with a jump like a
grasshopper or a frog, Gollum bounded forward into the darkness. But that was just
what Frodo and Sam had expected. Sam was on him before he had gone two paces
after his spring. Frodo coming behind grabbed his leg and threw him.
 'Your rope might prove useful again, Sam,' he said.
 Sam got out the rope. 'And where were you off to in the cold hard lands, Mr.
Gollum?' he growled. 'We wonders, aye, we wonders. To find some of your orcfriends, I warrant. You
nasty treacherous creature. It's round your neck this rope
ought to go, and a tight noose too.'
 Gollum lay quiet and tried no further tricks. He did not answer Sam, but gave him a
swift venomous look.
 'All we need is something to keep a hold on him,' said Frodo. 'We want him to walk,
so it's no good tying his legs – or his arms. He seems to use them nearly as much.
Tie one end to his ankle, and keep a grip on the other end.'
 He stood over Gollum, while Sam tied the knot. The result surprised them both.
Gollum began to scream, a thin, tearing sound, very horrible to hear. He writhed, and
tried to get his mouth to his ankle and bite the rope. He kept on screaming.
 At last Frodo was convinced that he really was in pain; but it could not be from the
knot. He examined it and found that it was not too tight, indeed hardly tight enough.
Sam was gentler than his words. 'What's the matter with you?' he said. 'If you will try
to run away, you must be tied; but we don't wish to hurt you.'
 'It hurts us, it hurts us,' hissed Gollum. 'It freezes, it bites! Elves twisted it, curse
them! Nasty cruel hobbits! That's why we tries to escape, of course it is, precious.
We guessed they were cruel hobbits. They visits Elves, fierce Elves with bright eyes.
Take it off us! It hurts us.'
 'No, I will not take it off you,' said Frodo, 'not unless' – he paused a moment in
thought – 'not unless there is any promise you can make that I can trust.'
 'We will swear to do what he wants, yes, yess,' said Gollum, still twisting and
 147
grabbling at his ankle. 'It hurts us.'
 'Swear?' said Frodo.
 'Smeagol,' said Gollum suddenly and clearly, opening his eyes wide and staring at
Frodo with a strange light. 'Smeagol will swear on the Precious.'
 Frodo drew himself up, and again Sam was startled by his words and his stern
voice. 'On the Precious? How dare you?' he said. 'Think!
One Ring to rule them all and in the Darkness bind them.
 Would you commit your promise to that, Smeagol? It will hold you. But it is more
treacherous than you are. It may twist your words. Beware!'
 Gollum cowered. 'On the Precious, on the Precious!' he repeated.
 'And what would you swear?' asked Frodo.
 'To be very very good,' said Gollum. Then crawling to Frodo's feet he grovelled
before him, whispering hoarsely: a shudder ran over him, as if the words shook his
very bones with fear. 'Smeagol will swear never, never, to let Him have it. Never!
Smeagol will save it. But he must swear on the Precious.'
 'No! not on it,' said Frodo, looking down at him with stern pity. 'All you wish is to
see it and touch it, if you can, though you know it would drive you mad. Not on it.
Swear by it, if you will. For you know where it is. Yes, you know, Smeagol. It is
before you.'
 For a moment it appeared to Sam that his master had grown and Gollum had
shrunk: a tall stern shadow, a mighty lord who hid his brightness in grey cloud, and
at his feet a little whining dog. Yet the two were in some way akin and not alien: they
could reach one another's minds. Gollum raised himself and began pawing at Frodo,
fawning at his knees.
 'Down! down!' said Frodo. 'Now speak your promise!'
 'We promises, yes I promise!' said Gollum. 'I will serve the master of the Precious.
Good master, good Smeagol, gollum, gollum!' Suddenly he began to weep and bite
at his ankle again.
 'Take the rope off, Sam!' said Frodo.
 Reluctantly Sam obeyed. At once Gollum got up and began prancing about, like a
whipped cur whose master has patted it. From that moment a change, which lasted
for some time, came over him. He spoke with less hissing and whining, and he
spoke to his companions direct, not to his precious self. He would cringe and flinch, if
they stepped near him or made any sudden movement, and he avoided the touch of
their elven-cloaks; but he was friendly, and indeed pitifully anxious to please. He
would cackle with laughter and caper, if any jest was made, or even if Frodo spoke
kindly to him, and weep if Frodo rebuked him. Sam said little to him of any sort. He
suspected him more deeply than ever, and if possible liked the new Gollum, the
Smeagol, less than the old.
 'Well, Gollum, or whatever it is we're to call you,' he said, 'now for it! The Moon's
gone, and the night's going. We'd better start.'
 'Yes, yes,' agreed Gollum, skipping about. 'Off we go! There's only one way across
between the North-end and the South-end. I found it, I did. Orcs don't use it, Orcs
don't know it. Orcs don't cross the Marshes, they go round for miles and miles. Very
lucky you came this way. Very lucky you found Smeagol, yes. Follow Smeagol!'
 He took a few steps away and looked back inquiringly, like a dog inviting them for a
walk. 'Wait a bit, Gollum!' cried Sam. 'Not too far ahead now! I'm going to be at your
tail, and I've got the rope handy.'
 148
 'No, no!' said Gollum. 'Smeagol promised.'
 In the deep of night under hard clear stars they set off. Gollum led them back
northward for a while along the way they had come; then he slanted to the right away
from the steep edge of the Emyn Muil, down the broken stony slopes towards the
vast fens below. They faded swiftly and softly into the darkness. Over all the leagues
of waste before the gates of Mordor there was a black silence.
Chapter 2
The Passage of the Marshes
 Gollum moved quickly, with his head and neck thrust forward, often using his
hands as well as his feet. Frodo and Sam were hard put to it to keep up with him; but
he seemed no longer to have any thought of escaping, and if they fell behind, he
would turn and wait for them. After a time he brought them to the brink of the narrow
gully that they had struck before; but they were now further from the hills.
 'Here it is!' he cried. 'There is a way down inside, yes. Now we follows it – out, out
away over there.' He pointed south and east towards the marshes. The reek of them
came to their nostrils, heavy and foul even in the cool night air.
 Gollum cast up and down along the brink, and at length he called to them. 'Here!
We can get down here. Smeagol went this way once: I went this way, hiding from
Orcs.'
 He led the way, and following him the hobbits climbed down into the gloom. It was
not difficult, for the rift was at this point only some fifteen feet deep and about a
dozen across. There was running water at the bottom: it was in fact the bed of one of
the many small rivers that trickled down from the hills to feed the stagnant pools and
mires beyond. Gollum turned to the right, southward more or less, and splashed
along with his feet in the shallow stony stream. He seemed greatly delighted to feel
the water, and chuckled to himself, sometimes even croaking in a sort of song.
The cold hard lands,
they bites our hands,
they gnaws our feet.
The rocks and stones
are like old bones
all bare of meat.
But stream and pool
is wet and cool:
so nice for feet!
And now we wish –
 'Ha! ha! What does we wish?' he said, looking sidelong at the hobbits. 'We'll tell
you.' he croaked. 'He guessed it long ago, Baggins guessed it.' A glint came into his
eyes, and Sam catching the gleam in the darkness thought it far from pleasant.
Alive without breath;
as cold as death;
never thirsting, ever drinking;
clad in mail, never clinking.
Drowns on dry land,
thinks an island
 149
is a mountain;
thinks a fountain
is a puff of air.
So sleek, so fair!
What a joy to meet!
We only wish
to catch a fish,
so juicy-sweet!
 These words only made more pressing to Sam's mind a problem that had been
troubling him from the moment when he understood that his master was going to
adopt Gollum as a guide: the problem of food. It did not occur to him that his master
might also have thought of it, but he supposed Gollum had. Indeed how had Gollum
kept himself in all his lonely wandering? 'Not too well,' thought Sam. 'He looks fair
famished. Not too dainty to try what hobbit tastes like if there ain't no fish, I'll wager –
supposing as he could catch us napping. Well, he won't: not Sam Gamgee for one.'
 They stumbled along in the dark winding gully for a long time, or so it seemed to
the tired feet of Frodo and Sam. The gully turned eastward, and as they went on it
broadened and got gradually shallower. At last the sky above grew faint with the first
grey of morning. Gollum had shown no signs of tiring, but now he looked up and
halted.
 'Day is near,' he whispered, as if Day was something that might overhear him and
spring on him. 'Smeagol will stay here: I will stay here, and the Yellow Face won't
see me.'
 'We should be glad to see the Sun;' said Frodo, 'but we will stay here: we are too
tired to go any further at present.'
 'You are not wise to be glad of the Yellow Face,' said Gollum. 'It shows you up.
Nice sensible hobbits stay with Smeagol. Orcs and nasty things are about. They can
see a long way. Stay and hide with me!'
 The three of them settled down to rest at the foot of the rocky wall of the gully. It
was not much more than a tall man's height now, and at its base there were wide flat
shelves of dry stone; the water ran in a channel on the other side. Frodo and Sam
sat on one of the flats, resting their backs. Gollum paddled and scrabbled in the
stream.
 'We must take a little food,' said Frodo. 'Are you hungry, Smeagol? We have very
little to share, but we will spare you what we can.'
 At the word hungry a greenish light was kindled in Gollum's pale eyes, and they
seemed to protrude further than ever from his thin sickly face. For a moment he
relapsed into his old Gollum-manner. 'We are famisshed, yes famisshed we are,
precious,' he said. 'What is it they eats? Have they nice fisshes?' His tongue lolled
out between his sharp yellow teeth, licking his colourless lips.
 'No, we have got no fish,' said Frodo. 'We have only got this' – he held up a wafer
of lembas – 'and water, if the water here is fit to drink.'
 'Yess, yess, nice water,' said Gollum. 'Drink it, drink it, while we can! But what is it
they've got, precious? Is it crunchable? Is it tasty?'
 Frodo broke off a portion of a wafer and handed it to him on its leaf-wrapping.
Gollum sniffed at the leaf and his face changed: a spasm of disgust came over it,
and a hint of his old malice. 'Smeagol smells it!' he said. 'Leaves out of the elfcountry, gah! They stinks.
He climbed in those trees, and he couldn't wash the smell
off his hands, my nice hands.' Dropping the leaf, he took a corner of the lembas and
 150
nibbled it. He spat, and a fit of coughing shook him.
 'Ach! No!' he spluttered. 'You try to choke poor Smeagol. Dust and ashes, he can't
eat that. He must starve. But Smeagol doesn't mind. Nice hobbits! Smeagol has
promised. He will starve. He can't eat hobbits' food. He will starve. Poor thin
Smeagol!'
 'I'm sorry,' said Frodo, 'but I can't help you, I'm afraid. I think this food would do you
good, if you would try. But perhaps you can't even try, not yet anyway.'
 The hobbits munched their lembas in silence. Sam thought that it tasted far better,
somehow, than it had for a good while: Gollum's behaviour had made him attend to
its flavour again. But he did not feel comfortable. Gollum watched every morsel from
hand to mouth, like an expectant dog by a diner's chair. Only when they had finished
and were preparing to rest, was he apparently convinced that they had no hidden
dainties that he could share in. Then he went and sat by himself a few paces away
and whimpered a little.
 'Look here!' Sam whispered to Frodo, not too softly: he did not really care whether
Gollum heard him or not. 'We've got to get some sleep; but not both together with
that hungry villain nigh, promise or no promise. Smeagol or Gollum, he won't change
his habits in a hurry, I'll warrant. You go to sleep, Mr. Frodo, and I'll call you when I
can't keep my eyelids propped up. Turn and about, same as before, while he's
loose.'
 'Perhaps you're right, Sam,' said Frodo speaking openly. 'There is a change in him,
but just what kind of a change and how deep, I'm not sure yet. Seriously though, I
don't think there is any need for fear – at present. Still watch if you wish. Give me
about two hours, not more, and then call me.'
 So tired was Frodo that his head fell forward on his breast and he slept, almost as
soon as he had spoken the words. Gollum seemed no longer to have any fears. He
curled up and went quickly to sleep, quite unconcerned. Presently his breath was
hissing softly through his clenched teeth, but he lay still as stone. After a while,
fearing that he would drop off himself, if he sat listening to his two companions
breathing, Sam got up and gently prodded Gollum. His hands uncurled and twitched,
but he made no other movement. Sam bent down and said fissh close to his ear, but
there was no response, not even a catch in Gollum's breathing.
 Sam scratched his head. 'Must really be asleep,' he muttered. 'And if I was like
Gollum, he wouldn't wake up never again.' He restrained the thoughts of his sword
and the rope that sprang to his mind, and went and sat down by his master.
 When he woke up the sky above was dim, not lighter but darker than when they
had breakfasted. Sam leapt to his feet. Not least from his own feeling of vigour and
hunger, he suddenly understood that he had slept the daylight away, nine hours at
least. Frodo was still fast asleep, lying now stretched on his side. Gollum was not to
be seen. Various reproachful names for himself came to Sam's mind, drawn from the
Gaffer's large paternal word-hoard; then it also occurred to him that his master had
been right: there had for the present been nothing to guard against. They were at
any rate both alive and unthrottled.
 'Poor wretch!' he said half remorsefully. 'Now I wonder where he's got to?'
 'Not far, not far!' said a voice above him. He looked up and saw the shape of
Gollum's large head and ears against the evening sky.
 'Here, what are you doing?' cried Sam, his suspicions coming back as soon as he
saw that shape.
 'Smeagol is hungry,' said Gollum. 'Be back soon.'
 'Come back now!' shouted Sam. 'Hi! Come back!' But Gollum had vanished.
 151
 Frodo woke at the sound of Sam's shout and sat up, rubbing his eyes. 'Hullo!' he
said. 'Anything wrong? What's the time?'
 'I dunno,' said Sam. 'After sundown, I reckon. And he's gone off. Says he's hungry.'
 'Don't worry!' said Frodo. 'There's no help for it. But he'll come back, you'll see. The
promise will hold yet a while. And he won't leave his Precious, anyway.'
 Frodo made light of it when he learned that they had slept soundly for hours with
Gollum, and a very hungry Gollum too, loose beside them. 'Don't think of any of your
Gaffer's hard names,' he said. 'You were worn out, and it has turned out well: we are
now both rested. And we have a hard road ahead, the worst road of all.'
 'About the food,' said Sam. 'How long's it going to take us to do this job? And when
it's done, what are we going to do then? This waybread keeps you on your legs in a
wonderful way, though it doesn't satisfy the innards proper, as you might say: not to
my feeling anyhow, meaning no disrespect to them as made it. But you have to eat
some of it every day, and it doesn't grow. I reckon we've got enough to last, say,
three weeks or so, and that with a tight belt and a light tooth, mind you. We've been
a bit free with it so far.'
 'I don't know how long we shall take to – to finish,' said Frodo. 'We were miserably
delayed in the hills. But Samwise Gamgee, my dear hobbit – indeed, Sam my
dearest hobbit, friend of friends – I do not think we need give thought to what comes
after that. To do the job as you put it – what hope is there that we ever shall? And if
we do, who knows what will come of that? If the One goes into the Fire, and we are
at hand? I ask you, Sam, are we ever likely to need bread again? I think not. If we
can nurse our limbs to bring us to Mount Doom, that is all we can do. More than I
can, I begin to feel.'
 Sam nodded silently. He took his master's hand and bent over it. He did not kiss it,
though his tears fell on it. Then he turned away, drew his sleeve over his nose, and
got up, and stamped about, trying to whistle, and saying between the efforts:
'Where's that dratted creature?'
 It was actually not long before Gollum returned; but he came so quietly that they
did not hear him till he stood before them. His fingers and face were soiled with black
mud. He was still chewing and slavering. What he was chewing, they did not ask or
like to think.
 'Worms or beetles or something slimy out of holes,' thought Sam. 'Brr! The nasty
creature; the poor wretch!'
 Gollum said nothing to them, until he had drunk deeply and washed himself in the
stream. Then he came up to them, licking his lips. 'Better now,' he said. 'Are we
rested? Ready to go on? Nice hobbits, they sleep beautifully. Trust Smeagol now?
Very, very good.'
 The next stage of their journey was much the same as the last. As they went on
the gully became ever shallower and the slope of its floor more gradual. Its bottom
was less stony and more earthy, and slowly its sides dwindled to mere banks. It
began to wind and wander. That night drew to its end, but clouds were now over
moon and star, and they knew of the coming of day only by the slow spreading of the
thin grey light.
 In a chill hour they came to the end of the water-course. The banks became mossgrown mounds. Over
the last shelf of rotting stone the stream gurgled and fell down
into a brown bog and was lost. Dry reeds hissed and rattled though they could feel
no wind.
 On either side and in front wide fens and mires now lay, stretching away southward
and eastward into the dim half-light. Mists curled and smoked from dark and
 152
noisome pools. The reek of them hung stifling in the still air. Far away, now almost
due south, the mountain-walls of Mordor loomed, like a black bar of rugged clouds
floating above a dangerous fog-bound sea.
 The hobbits were now wholly in the hands of Gollum. They did now know, and
could not guess in that misty light, that they were in fact only just within the northern
borders of the marshes, the main expanse of which lay south of them. They could, if
they had known the lands, with some delay have retraced their steps a little, and
then turning east have come round over hard roads to the bare plain of Dagorlad: the
field of the ancient battle before the gates of Mordor. Not that there was great hope
in such a course. On that stony plain there was no cover, and across it ran the
highways of the Orcs and the soldiers of the Enemy. Not even the cloaks of Lorien
would have concealed them there.
 'How do we shape our course now, Smeagol?' asked Frodo. 'Must we cross these
evil-smelling fens?'
 'No need, no need at all,' said Gollum. 'Not if hobbits want to reach the dark
mountains and go to see Him very quick. Back a little, and round a little' – his skinny
arm waved north and east – 'and you can come on hard cold roads to the very gates
of His country. Lots of His people will be there looking out for guests, very pleased to
take them straight to Him, O yes. His Eye watches that way all the time. It caught
Smeagol there, long ago.' Gollum shuddered. 'But Smeagol has used his eyes since
then, yes, yes: I've used eyes and feet and nose since then. l know other ways. More
difficult, not so quick; but better, if we don't want Him to see. Follow Smeagol! He
can take you through the marshes, through the mists, nice thick mists. Follow
Smeagol very carefully, and you may go a long way, quite a long way, before He
catches you, yes perhaps.'
 It was already day, a windless and sullen morning, and the marsh-reeks lay in
heavy banks. No sun pierced the low clouded sky, and Gollum seemed anxious to
continue the journey at once. So after a brief rest they set out again and were soon
lost in a shadowy silent world, cut off from all view of the lands about, either the hills
that they had left or the mountains that they sought. They went slowly in single file:
Gollum, Sam, Frodo.
 Frodo seemed the most weary of the three, and slow though they went, he often
lagged. The hobbits soon found that what had looked like one vast fen was really an
endless network of pools, and soft mires, and winding half-strangled water-courses.
Among these a cunning eye and foot could thread a wandering path. Gollum
certainly had that cunning, and needed all of it. His head on its long neck was ever
turning this way and that, while he sniffed and muttered all the time to himself.
Sometimes he would hold up his hand and halt them, while he went forward a little,
crouching, testing the ground with fingers or toes, or merely listening with one ear
pressed to the earth.
 It was dreary and wearisome. Cold clammy winter still held sway in this forsaken
country. The only green was the scum of livid weed on the dark greasy surfaces of
the sullen waters. Dead grasses and rotting reeds loomed up in the mists like ragged
shadows of long-forgotten summers.
 As the day wore on the light increased a little, and the mists lifted, growing thinner
and more transparent. Far above the rot and vapours of the world the Sun was riding
high and golden now in a serene country with floors of dazzling foam, but only a
passing ghost of her could they see below, bleared, pale, giving no colour and no
warmth. But even at this faint reminder of her presence Gollum scowled and
flinched. He halted their journey, and they rested, squatting like little hunted animals,
 153
in the borders of a great brown reed-thicket. There was a deep silence, only scraped
on its surfaces by the faint quiver of empty seed-plumes, and broken grass-blades
trembling in small air-movements that they could not feel.
 'Not a bird!' said Sam mournfully.
 'No, no birds,' said Gollum. 'Nice birds!' He licked his teeth. 'No birds here. There
are snakeses, wormses, things in the pools. Lots of things, lots of nasty things. No
birds,' he ended sadly. Sam looked at him with distaste.
 So passed the third day of their journey with Gollum. Before the shadows of
evening were long in happier lands, they went on again, always on and on with only
brief halts. These they made not so much for rest as to help Gollum; for now even he
had to go forward with great care, and he was sometimes at a loss for a while. They
had come to the very midst of the Dead Marshes, and it was dark.
 They walked slowly, stooping, keeping close in line, following attentively every
move that Gollum made. The fens grew more wet, opening into wide stagnant
meres, among which it grew more and more difficult to find the firmer places where
feet could tread without sinking into gurgling mud. The travellers were light, or maybe
none of them would ever have found a way through.
 Presently it grew altogether dark: the air itself seemed black and heavy to breathe.
When lights appeared Sam rubbed his eyes: he thought his head was going queer.
He first saw one with the corner of his left eye, a wisp of pale sheen that faded away;
but others appeared soon after: some like dimly shining smoke, some like misty
flames flickering slowly above unseen candles; here and there they twisted like
ghostly sheets unfurled by hidden hands. But neither of his companions spoke a
word.
 At last Sam could bear it no longer. 'What's all this, Gollum?' he said in a whisper.
'These lights? They're all round us now. Are we trapped? Who are they?'
 Gollum looked up. A dark water was before him, and he was crawling on the
ground, this way and that, doubtful of the way. 'Yes, they are all round us,' he
whispered. 'The tricksy lights. Candles of corpses, yes, yes. Don't you heed them!
Don't look! Don't follow them! Where's the master?'
 Sam looked back and found that Frodo had lagged again. He could not see him.
He went some paces back into the darkness, not daring to move far, or to call in
more than a hoarse whisper. Suddenly he stumbled against Frodo, who was
 154
standing lost in thought, looking at the pale lights. His hands hung stiff at his sides;
water and slime were dripping from them.
 'Come, Mr. Frodo!' said Sam. 'Don't look at them! Gollum says we mustn't. Let's
keep up with him and get out of this cursed place as quick as we can – if we can!'
 'All right,' said Frodo, as if returning out of a dream. 'I'm coming. Go on!'
 Hurrying forward again, Sam tripped, catching his foot in some old root or tussock.
He fell and came heavily on his hands, which sank deep into sticky ooze, so that his
face was brought close to the surface of the dark mere. There was a faint hiss, a
noisome smell went up, the lights flickered and danced and swirled. For a moment
the water below him looked like some window, glazed with grimy glass, through
which he was peering. Wrenching his hands out of the bog, he sprang back with a
cry. 'There are dead things, dead faces in the water,' he said with horror. 'Dead
faces!'
 Gollum laughed. 'The Dead Marshes, yes, yes: that is their names,' he cackled.
'You should not look in when the candles are lit.'
 'Who are they? What are they?' asked Sam shuddering, turning to Frodo, who was
now behind him.
 'I don't know,' said Frodo in a dreamlike voice. 'But I have seen them too. In the
pools when the candles were lit. They lie in all the pools, pale faces, deep deep
under the dark water. I saw them: grim faces and evil, and noble faces and sad.
Many faces proud and fair, and weeds in their silver hair. But all foul, all rotting, all
dead. A fell light is in them.' Frodo hid his eyes in his hands. 'I know not who they
are; but I thought I saw there Men and Elves, and Orcs beside them.'
 'Yes, yes,' said Gollum. 'All dead, all rotten. Elves and Men and Orcs. The Dead
Marshes. There was a great battle long ago, yes, so they told him when Smeagol
was young, when I was young before the Precious came. It was a great battle. Tall
Men with long swords, and terrible Elves, and Orcses shrieking. They fought on the
plain for days and months at the Black Gates. But the Marshes have grown since
then, swallowed up the graves; always creeping, creeping.'
 'But that is an age and more ago,' said Sam. 'The Dead can't be really there! Is it
some devilry hatched in the Dark Land?'
 'Who knows? Smeagol doesn't know,' answered Gollum. 'You cannot reach them,
you cannot touch them. We tried once, yes, precious, I tried once; but you cannot
reach them. Only shapes to see, perhaps, not to touch. No precious! All dead.'
 Sam looked darkly at him and shuddered again, thinking that he guessed why
Smeagol had tried to touch them. 'Well, I don't want to see them,' he said. 'Never
again! Can't we get on and get away?'
 'Yes, yes,' said Gollum. 'But slowly, very slowly. Very carefully! Or hobbits go down
to join the Dead ones and light little candles. Follow Smeagol! Don't look at lights!'
 He crawled away to the right, seeking for a path round the mere. They came close
behind, stooping, often using their hands even as he did. 'Three precious little
Gollums in a row we shall be, if this goes on much longer,' thought Sam.
 At last they came to the end of the black mere, and they crossed it, perilously,
crawling or hopping from one treacherous island tussock to another. Often they
floundered, stepping or falling hands-first into waters as noisome as a cesspool, till
they were slimed and fouled almost up to their necks and stank in one another's
nostrils.
 It was late in the night when at length they reached firmer ground again. Gollum
hissed and whispered to himself, but it appeared that he was pleased: in some
mysterious way, by some blended sense of feel, and smell, and uncanny memory for
 155
shapes in the dark, he seemed to know just where he was again, and to be sure of
his road ahead.
 'Now on we go!' he said. 'Nice hobbits! Brave hobbits! Very very weary, of course;
so we are, my precious, all of us. But we must take master away from the wicked
lights, yes, yes, we must.' With these words he started off again, almost at a trot,
down what appeared to be a long lane between high reeds, and they stumbled after
him as quickly as they could. But in a little while he stopped suddenly and sniffed the
air doubtfully, hissing as if he was troubled or displeased again.
 'What is it?' growled Sam, misinterpreting the signs. 'What's the need to sniff? The
stink nearly knocks me down with my nose held. You stink, and master stinks; the
whole place stinks.'
 'Yes, yes, and Sam stinks!' answered Gollum. 'Poor Smeagol smells it, but good
Smeagol bears it. Helps nice master. But that's no matter. The air's moving, change
is coming. Smeagol wonders; he's not happy.'
 He went on again, but his uneasiness grew, and every now and again he stood up
to his full height, craning his neck eastward and southward. For some time the
hobbits could not hear or feel what was troubling him. Then suddenly all three halted,
stiffening and listening. To Frodo and Sam it seemed that they heard, far away, a
long wailing cry, high and thin and cruel. They shivered. At the same moment the
stirring of the air became perceptible to them; and it grew very cold. As they stood
straining their ears, they heard a noise like a wind coming in the distance. The misty
lights wavered, dimmed, and went out.
 Gollum would not move. He stood shaking and gibbering to himself, until with a
rush the wind came upon them, hissing and snarling over the marshes. The night
became less dark, light enough for them to see, or half see, shapeless drifts of fog,
curling and twisting as it rolled over them and passed them. Looking up they saw the
clouds breaking and shredding; and then high in the south the moon glimmered out,
riding in the flying wrack.
 For a moment the sight of it gladdened the hearts of the hobbits; but Gollum
cowered down, muttering curses on the White Face. Then Frodo and Sam staring at
the sky, breathing deeply of the fresher air, saw it come: a small cloud flying from the
accursed hills; a black shadow loosed from Mordor; a vast shape winged and
ominous. It scudded across the moon, and with a deadly cry went away westward,
outrunning the wind in its fell speed.
 They fell forward, grovelling heedlessly on the cold earth. But the shadow of horror
wheeled and returned, passing lower now, right above them, sweeping the fen-reek
with its ghastly wings. And then it was gone, flying back to Mordor with the speed of
the wrath of Sauron; and behind it the wind roared away, leaving the Dead Marshes
bare and bleak. The naked waste, as far as the eye could pierce, even to the distant
menace of the mountains, was dappled with the fitful moonlight.
 Frodo and Sam got up, rubbing their eyes, like children wakened from an evil
dream to find the familiar night still over the world. But Gollum lay on the ground as if
he had been stunned. They roused him with difficulty, and for some time he would
not lift his face, but knelt forward on his elbows, covering the back of his head with
his large flat hands.
 'Wraiths!' he wailed. 'Wraiths on wings! The Precious is their master. They see
everything, everything. Nothing can hide from them. Curse the White Face! And they
tell Him everything. He sees, He knows. Ach, gollum, gollum, gollum!' It was not until
the moon had sunk, westering far beyond Tol Brandir, that he would get up or make
a move.
 156
 From that time on Sam thought that he sensed a change in Gollum again. He was
more fawning and would-be friendly; but Sam surprised some strange looks in his
eyes at times, especially towards Frodo; and he went back more and more into his
old manner of speaking. And Sam had another growing anxiety. Frodo seemed to be
weary, weary to the point of exhaustion. He said nothing, indeed he hardly spoke at
all; and he did not complain, but he walked like one who carries a load, the weight of
which is ever increasing; and he dragged along, slower and slower, so that Sam had
often to beg Gollum to wait and not to leave their master behind.
 In fact with every step towards the gates of Mordor Frodo felt the Ring on its chain
about his neck grow more burdensome. He was now beginning to feel it as an actual
weight dragging him earthwards. But far more he was troubled by the Eye: so he
called it to himself. It was that more than the drag of the Ring that made him cower
and stoop as he walked. The Eye: that horrible growing sense of a hostile will that
strove with great power to pierce all shadows of cloud, and earth, and flesh, and to
see you: to pin you under its deadly gaze, naked, immovable. So thin, so frail and
thin, the veils were become that still warded it off. Frodo knew just where the present
habitation and heart of that will now was: as certainly as a man can tell the direction
of the sun with his eyes shut. He was facing it, and its potency beat upon his brow.
 Gollum probably felt something of the same sort. But what went on in his wretched
heart between the pressure of the Eye, and the lust of the Ring that was so near,
and his grovelling promise made half in the fear of cold iron, the hobbits did not
guess: Frodo gave no thought to it. Sam's mind was occupied mostly with his master
hardly noticing the dark cloud that had fallen on his own heart. He put Frodo in front
of him now, and kept a watchful eye on every movement of his, supporting him if he
stumbled, and trying to encourage him with clumsy words.
 When day came at last the hobbits were surprised to see how much closer the
ominous mountains had already drawn. The air was now clearer and colder, and
though still far off, the walls of Mordor were no longer a cloudy menace on the edge
of sight, but as grim black towers they frowned across a dismal waste. The marshes
were at an end, dying away into dead peats and wide flats of dry cracked mud. The
land ahead rose in long shallow slopes, barren and pitiless, towards the desert that
lay at Sauron's gate.
 While the grey light lasted, they cowered under a black stone like worms,
shrinking, lest the winged terror should pass and spy them with its cruel eyes. The
remainder of that journey was a shadow of growing fear in which memory could find
nothing to rest upon. For two more nights they struggled on through the weary
pathless land. The air, as it seemed to them, grew harsh, and filled with a bitter reek
that caught their breath and parched their mouths.
 At last, on the fifth morning since they took the road with Gollum, they halted once
more. Before them dark in the dawn the great mountains reached up to roofs of
smoke and cloud. Out from their feet were flung huge buttresses and broken hills
that were now at the nearest scarce a dozen miles away. Frodo looked round in
horror. Dreadful as the Dead Marshes had been, and the arid moors of the Nomanlands, more
loathsome far was the country that the crawling day now slowly unveiled
to his shrinking eyes. Even to the Mere of Dead Faces some haggard phantom of
green spring would come; but here neither spring nor summer would ever come
again. Here nothing lived, not even the leprous growths that feed on rottenness. The
gasping pools were choked with ash and crawling muds, sickly white and grey, as if
the mountains had vomited the filth of their entrails upon the lands about. High
mounds of crushed and powdered rock, great cones of earth fire-blasted and poison-
 157
stained, stood like an obscene graveyard in endless rows, slowly revealed in the
reluctant light.
 They had come to the desolation that lay before Mordor: the lasting monument to
the dark labour of its slaves that should endure when all their purposes were made
void; a land defiled, diseased beyond all healing – unless the Great Sea should enter
in and wash it with oblivion. 'I feel sick,' said Sam. Frodo did not speak.
 For a while they stood there, like men on the edge of a sleep where nightmare
lurks, holding it off, though they know that they can only come to morning through
the shadows. The light broadened and hardened. The gasping pits and poisonous
mounds grew hideously clear. The sun was up, walking among clouds and long flags
of smoke, but even the sunlight was defiled. The hobbits had no welcome for that
light; unfriendly it seemed, revealing them in their helplessness – little squeaking
ghosts that wandered among the ash-heaps of the Dark Lord.
 Too weary to go further they sought for some place where they could rest. For a
while they sat without speaking under the shadow of a mound of slag; but foul fumes
leaked out of it, catching their throats and choking them. Gollum was the first to get
up. Spluttering and cursing he rose, and without a word or a glance at the hobbits he
crawled away on all fours. Frodo and Sam crawled after him, until they came to a
wide almost circular pit, high-banked upon the west. It was cold and dead, and a foul
sump of oily many-coloured ooze lay at its bottom. In this evil hole they cowered,
hoping in its shadow to escape the attention of the Eye.
 The day passed slowly. A great thirst troubled them, but they drank only a few
drops from their bottles – last filled in the gully, which now as they looked back in
thought seemed to them a place of peace and beauty. The hobbits took it in turn to
watch. At first, tired as they were, neither of them could sleep at all; but as the sun
far away was climbing down into slow moving cloud, Sam dozed. It was Frodo's turn
to be on guard. He lay back on the slope of the pit, but that did not ease the sense of
burden that was on him. He looked up at the smoke-streaked sky and saw strange
phantoms, dark riding shapes, and faces out of the past. He lost count of time,
hovering between sleep and waking, until forgetfulness came over him.
 Suddenly Sam woke up thinking that he heard his master calling. It was evening.
Frodo could not have called, for he had fallen asleep, and had slid down nearly to
the bottom of the pit. Gollum was by him. For a moment Sam thought that he was
trying to rouse Frodo; then he saw that it was not so. Gollum was talking to himself.
Smeagol was holding a debate with some other thought that used the same voice
but made it squeak and hiss. A pale light and a green light alternated in his eyes as
he spoke.
 'Smeagol promised,' said the first thought.
 'Yes, yes, my precious,' came the answer, 'we promised: to save our Precious, not
to let Him have it – never. But it's going to Him yes, nearer every step. What's the
hobbit going to do with it, we wonders, yes we wonders.'
 'I don't know. I can't help it. Master's got it. Smeagol promised to help the master.'
 'Yes, yes, to help the master: the master of the Precious. But if we was master,
then we could help ourselfs, yes, and still keep promises.'
 'But Smeagol said he would be very very good. Nice hobbit! He took cruel rope off
Smeagol's leg. He speaks nicely to me.'
 'Very very good, eh, my precious? Let's be good, good as fish, sweet one, but to
ourselfs. Not hurt the nice hobbit, of course, no, no.'
 'But the Precious holds the promise,' the voice of Smeagol objected.
 'Then take it,' said the other, 'and let's hold it ourselfs! Then we shall be master,
 158
gollum! Make the other hobbit, the nasty suspicious hobbit, make him crawl, yes,
gollum!'
 'But not the nice hobbit?'
 'Oh no, not if it doesn't please us. Still he's a Baggins, my precious, yes, a Baggins.
A Baggins stole it. He found it and he said nothing, nothing. We hates Bagginses.'
 'No, not this Baggins.'
 'Yes, every Baggins. All peoples that keep the Precious. We must have it!'
 'But He'll see, He'll know. He'll take it from us!'
 'He sees. He knows. He heard us make silly promises – against His orders, yes.
Must take it. The Wraiths are searching. Must take it.'
 'Not for Him!'
 'No, sweet one. See, my precious: if we has it, then we can escape, even from
Him, eh? Perhaps we grows very strong, stronger than Wraiths. Lord Smeagol?
Gollum the Great? The Gollum! Eat fish every day, three times a day; fresh from the
sea. Most Precious Gollum! Must have it. We wants it, we wants it, we wants it!'
 'But there's two of them. They'll wake too quick and kill us,' whined Smeagol in a
last effort. 'Not now. Not yet.'
 'We wants it! But' – and here there was a long pause, as if a new thought had
wakened. 'Not yet, eh? Perhaps not. She might help. She might, yes.'
 'No, no! Not that way!' wailed Smeagol.
 'Yes! We wants it! We wants it!'
 Each time that the second thought spoke, Gollum's long hand crept out slowly,
pawing towards Frodo, and then was drawn back with a jerk as Smeagol spoke
again. Finally both arms, with long fingers flexed and twitching, clawed towards his
neck.
 Sam had lain still, fascinated by this debate, but watching every move that Gollum
made from under his half-closed eye-lids. To his simple mind ordinary hunger, the
desire to eat hobbits, had seemed the chief danger in Gollum. He realized now that it
was not so: Gollum was feeling the terrible call of the Ring. The Dark Lord was He,
of course; but Sam wondered who She was. One of the nasty friends the little wretch
had made in his wanderings, he supposed. Then he forgot the point, for things had
plainly gone far enough, and were getting dangerous. A great heaviness was in all
his limbs, but he roused himself with an effort and sat up. Something warned him to
be careful and not to reveal that he had overheard the debate. He let out a loud sigh
and gave a huge yawn.
 'What's the time?' he said sleepily.
 Gollum sent out a long hiss through his teeth. He stood up for a moment, tense
and menacing; and then he collapsed, falling forward on to all fours and crawling up
the bank of the pit. 'Nice hobbits! Nice Sam!' he said. 'Sleepy heads, yes, sleepy
heads! Leave good Smeagol to watch! But it's evening. Dusk is creeping. Time to
go.'
 'High time!' thought Sam. 'And time we parted, too.' Yet it crossed his mind to
wonder if indeed Gollum was not now as dangerous turned loose as kept with them.
'Curse him! I wish he was choked!' he muttered. He stumbled down the bank and
roused his master.
 Strangely enough, Frodo felt refreshed. He had been dreaming. The dark shadow
had passed, and a fair vision had visited him in this land of disease. Nothing
remained of it in his memory, yet because of it he felt glad and lighter of heart. His
burden was less heavy on him. Gollum welcomed him with dog-like delight. He
chuckled and chattered, cracking his long fingers, and pawing at Frodo's knees.
 159
Frodo smiled at him.
 'Come!' he said. 'You have guided us well and faithfully. This is the last stage.
Bring us to the Gate, and then I will not ask you to go further. Bring us to the Gate,
and you may go where you wish – only not to our enemies.'
 'To the Gate, eh?' Gollum squeaked, seeming surprised and frightened. 'To the
Gate, master says! Yes, he says so. And good Smeagol does what he asks, O yes.
But when we gets closer, we'll see perhaps we'll see then. It won't look nice at all. O
no! O no!'
 'Go on with you!' said Sam. 'Let's get it over!'
 In the falling dusk they scrambled out of the pit and slowly threaded their way
through the dead land. They had not gone far before they felt once more the fear that
had fallen on them when the winged shape swept over the marshes. They halted,
cowering on the evil-smelling ground; but they saw nothing in the gloomy evening
sky above, and soon the menace passed, high overhead, going maybe on some
swift errand from Barad-dur. After a while Gollum got up and crept forward again,
muttering and shaking.
 About an hour after midnight the fear fell on them a third time, but it now seemed
more remote, as if it were passing far above the clouds, rushing with terrible speed
into the West. Gollum, however, was helpless with terror, and was convinced that
they were being hunted, that their approach was known.
 'Three times!' he whimpered. 'Three times is a threat. They feel us here, they feel
the Precious. The Precious is their master. We cannot go any further this way, no.
It's no use, no use!'
 Pleading and kind words were no longer of any avail. It was not until Frodo
commanded him angrily and laid a hand on his sword-hilt that Gollum would get up
again. Then at last he rose with a snarl, and went before them like a beaten dog.
 So they stumbled on through the weary end of the night, and until the coming of
another day of fear they walked in silence with bowed heads, seeing nothing, and
hearing nothing but the wind hissing in their ears.
Chapter 3
The Black Gate is Closed
 Before the next day dawned their journey to Mordor was over. The marshes and
the desert were behind them. Before them, darkling against a pallid sky, the great
mountains reared their threatening heads.
 Upon the west of Mordor marched the gloomy range of Ephel Duath, the
Mountains of Shadow, and upon the north the broken peaks and barren ridges of
Ered Lithui, grey as ash. But as these ranges approached one another, being indeed
but parts of one great wall about the mournful plains of Lithlad and of Gorgoroth, and
the bitter inland sea of Nurnen amidmost, they swung out long arms northward; and
between these arms there was a deep defile. This was Cirith Gorgor, the Haunted
Pass, the entrance to the land of the Enemy. High cliffs lowered upon either side,
and thrust forward from its mouth were two sheer hills, black-boned and bare. Upon
them stood the Teeth of Mordor, two towers strong and tall. In days long past they
were built by the Men of Gondor in their pride and power, after the overthrow of
Sauron and his flight, lest he should seek to return to his old realm. But the strength
of Gondor failed, and men slept, and for long years the towers stood empty. Then
Sauron returned. Now the watch-towers, which had fallen into decay, were repaired,
and filled with arms, and garrisoned with ceaseless vigilance. Stony-faced they were,
 160
with dark window-holes staring north and east and west, and each window was full of
sleepless eyes.
 Across the mouth of the pass, from cliff to cliff, the Dark Lord had built a rampart of
stone. In it there was a single gate of iron, and upon its battlement sentinels paced
unceasingly. Beneath the hills on either side the rock was bored into a hundred
caves and maggot-holes: there a host of orcs lurked, ready at a signal to issue forth
like black ants going to war. None could pass the Teeth of Mordor and not feel their
bite, unless they were summoned by Sauron, or knew the secret passwords that
would open the Morannon, the black gate of his land.
 The two hobbits gazed at the towers and the wall in despair. Even from a distance
they could see in the dim light the movement of the black guards upon the wall, and
the patrols before the gate. They lay now peering over the edge of a rocky hollow
beneath the out-stretched shadow of the northmost buttress of Ephel Duath. Winging
the heavy air in a straight flight a crow, maybe, would have flown but a furlong from
their hiding-place to the black summit of the nearer tower. A faint smoke curled
above it, as if fire smouldered in the hill beneath.
 Day came, and the fallow sun blinked over the lifeless ridges of Ered Lithui. Then
suddenly the cry of brazen-throated trumpets was heard: from the watch-towers they
blared, and far away from hidden holds and outposts in the hills came answering
calls; and further still, remote but deep and ominous, there echoed in the hollow land
beyond the mighty horns and drums of Barad-dur. Another dreadful day of fear and
toil had come to Mordor; and the night-guards were summoned to their dungeons
and deep halls, and the day-guards, evil-eyed and fell, were marching to their posts.
Steel gleamed dimly on the battlement.
 'Well, here we are!' said Sam. 'Here's the Gate, and it looks to me as if that's about
as far as we are ever going to get. My word, but the Gaffer would have a thing or two
to say, if he saw me now! Often said I'd come to a bad end, if I didn't watch my step,
he did. But now I don't suppose I'll ever see the old fellow again. He'll miss his
chance of I told'ee so, Sam: more's the pity. He could go on telling me as long as
he'd got breath, if only I could see his old face again. But I'd have to get a wash first,
or he wouldn't know me.
 'I suppose it's no good asking "what way do we go now?" We can't go no further –
unless we want to ask the orcs for a lift.'
 161
 'No, no!' said Gollum. 'No use. We can't go further. Smeagol said so. He said: we'll
go to the Gate, and then we'll see. And we do see. O yes, my precious, we do see.
Smeagol knew hobbits could not go this way. O yes, Smeagol knew.'
 'Then what the plague did you bring us here for?' said Sam, not feeling in the mood
to be just or reasonable.
 'Master said so. Master says: Bring us to the Gate. So good Smeagol does so.
Master said so, wise master.'
 'I did,' said Frodo. His face was grim and set, but resolute. He was filthy, haggard,
and pinched with weariness, but he cowered no longer, and his eyes were clear. 'I
said so, because I purpose to enter Mordor, and I know no other way. Therefore I
shall go this way. I do not ask anyone to go with me.'
 'No, no, master!' wailed Gollum; pawing at him, and seeming in great distress. 'No
use that way! No use! Don't take the Precious to Him! He'll eat us all, if He gets it,
eat all the world. Keep it, nice master, and be kind to Smeagol. Don't let Him have it.
Or go away, go to nice places, and give it back to little Smeagol. Yes, yes, master:
give it back, eh? Smeagol will keep it safe; he will do lots of good, especially to nice
hobbits. Hobbits go home. Don't go to the Gate!'
 'I am commanded to go to the land of Mordor, and therefore I shall go,' said Frodo.
'If there is only one way, then I must take it. What comes after must come.'
 Sam said nothing. The look on Frodo's face was enough for him he knew that
words of his were useless. And after all he never had any real hope in the affair from
the beginning; but being a cheerful hobbit he had not needed hope, as long as
despair could be postponed. Now they were come to the bitter end. But he had stuck
to his master all the way; that was what he had chiefly come for, and he would still
stick to him. His master would not go to Mordor alone. Sam would go with him – and
at any rate they would get rid of Gollum.
 Gollum, however, did not intend to be got rid of, yet. He knelt at Frodo's feet,
wringing his hands and squeaking. 'Not this way, master!' he pleaded, 'There is
another way. O yes indeed there is. Another way, darker, more difficult to find, more
secret. But Smeagol knows it. Let Smeagol show you!'
 'Another way!' said Frodo doubtfully, looking down at Gollum with searching eyes.
 'Yess! Yess indeed! There was another way. Smeagol found it. Let's go and see if
it's still there!'
 'You have not spoken of this before.'
 'No. Master did not ask. Master did not say what he meant to do. He does not tell
poor Smeagol. He says: Smeagol, take me to the Gate – and then good bye!
Smeagol can run away and be good. But now he says: I purpose to enter Mordor this
way. So Smeagol is very afraid. He does not want to lose nice master. And he
promised, master made him promise, to save the Precious. But master is going to
take it to Him, straight to the Black Hand, if master will go this way. So Smeagol
must save them both, and he thinks of another way that there was, once upon a
time. Nice master. Smeagol very good, always helps.'
 Sam frowned. If he could have bored holes in Gollum with his eyes, he would have
done. His mind was full of doubt. To all appearances Gollum was genuinely
distressed and anxious to help Frodo. But Sam, remembering the overheard debate,
found it hard to believe that the long submerged Smeagol had come out on top: that
voice at any rate had not had the last word in the debate. Sam's guess was that the
Smeagol and Gollum halves (or what in his own mind he called Slinker and Stinker)
had made a truce and a temporary alliance: neither wanted the Enemy to get the
Ring; both wished to keep Frodo from capture, and under their eye, as long as
 162
possible – at any rate as long as Stinker still had a chance of laying hands on his
'Precious'. Whether there really was another way into Mordor Sam doubted.
 'And it's a good thing neither half of the old villain don't know what master means to
do,' he thought. 'If he knew that Mr. Frodo is trying to put an end to his Precious for
good and all, there'd be trouble pretty quick, I bet. Anyhow old Stinker is so
frightened of the Enemy – and he's under orders of some kind from him, or was –
that he'd give us away rather than be caught helping us; and rather than let his
Precious be melted, maybe. At least that's my idea. And I hope the master will think
it out carefully. He's as wise as any, but he's soft-hearted, that's what he is. It's
beyond any Gamgee to guess what he'll do next.'
 Frodo did not answer Gollum at once. While these doubts were passing through
Sam's slow but shrewd mind, he stood gazing out towards the dark cliff of Cirith
Gorgor. The hollow in which they had taken refuge was delved in the side of a low
hill, at some little height above a long trenchlike valley that lay between it and the
outer buttresses of the mountains. In the midst of the valley stood the black
foundations of the western watch-tower. By morning-light the roads that converged
upon the Gate of Mordor could now be clearly seen, pale and dusty; one winding
back northwards; another dwindling eastwards into the mists that clung about the
feet of Ered Lithui; and a third that ran towards him. As it bent sharply round the
tower, it entered a narrow defile and passed not far below the hollow where he
stood. Westward, to his right, it turned, skirting the shoulders of the mountains, and
went off southwards into the deep shadows that mantled all the western sides of
Ephel Duath; beyond his sight it journeyed on into the narrow land between the
mountains and the Great River.
 As he gazed Frodo became aware that there was a great stir and movement on
the plain. It seemed as if whole armies were on the march, though for the most part
they were hidden by the reeks and fumes drifting from the fens and wastes beyond.
But here and there he caught the gleam of spears and helmets; and over the levels
beside the roads horsemen could be seen riding in many companies. He
remembered his vision from afar upon Amon Hen, so few days before, though now it
seemed many years ago. Then he knew that the hope that had for one wild moment
stirred in his heart was vain. The trumpets had not rung in challenge but in greeting.
This was no assault upon the Dark Lord by the men of Gondor, risen like avenging
ghosts from the graves of valour long passed away. These were Men of other race,
out of the wide Eastlands, gathering to the summons of their Overlord; armies that
had encamped before his Gate by night and now marched in to swell his mounting
power. As if suddenly made fully aware of the peril of their position, alone, in the
growing light of day, so near to this vast menace, Frodo quickly drew his frail grey
hood close upon his head, and stepped down into the dell. Then he turned to
Gollum.
 'Smeagol,' he said, 'I will trust you once more. lndeed it seems that I must do so,
and that it is my fate to receive help from you, where I least looked for it, and your
fate to help me whom you long pursued with evil purpose. So far you have deserved
well of me and have kept your promise truly. Truly, I say and mean,' he added with a
glance at Sam, 'for twice now we have been in your power, and you have done no
harm to us. Nor have you tried to take from me what you once sought. May the third
time prove the best! But I warn you, Smeagol, you are in danger.'
 'Yes, yes, master!' said Gollum. 'Dreadful danger! Smeagol's bones shake to think
of it, but he doesn't run away. He must help nice master.'
 'I did not mean the danger that we all share,' said Frodo. 'I mean a danger to
 163
yourself alone. You swore a promise by what you call the Precious. Remember that!
It will hold you to it; but it will seek a way to twist it to your own undoing. Already you
are being twisted. You revealed yourself to me just now, foolishly. Give it back to
Smeagol you said. Do not say that again! Do not let that thought grow in you! You
will never get it back. But the desire of it may betray you to a bitter end. You will
never get it back. In the last need, Smeagol, I should put on the Precious; and the
Precious mastered you long ago. If I, wearing it, were to command you, you would
obey, even if it were to leap from a precipice or to cast yourself into the fire. And
such would be my command. So have a care, Smeagol!'
 Sam looked at his master with approval, but also with surprise: there was a look in
his face and a tone in his voice that he had not known before. It had always been a
notion of his that the kindness of dear Mr. Frodo was of such a high degree that it
must imply a fair measure of blindness. Of course, he also firmly held the
incompatible belief that Mr. Frodo was the wisest person in the world (with the
possible exception of Old Mr. Bilbo and of Gandalf). Gollum in his own way, and with
much more excuse as his acquaintance was much briefer, may have made a similar
mistake, confusing kindness and blindness. At any rate this speech abashed and
terrified him. He grovelled on the ground and could speak no clear words but nice
master.
 Frodo waited patiently for a while, then he spoke again less sternly. 'Come now,
Gollum or Smeagol if you wish, tell me of this other way, and show me, if you can,
what hope there is in it, enough to justify me in turning aside from my plain path. I am
in haste.'
 But Gollum was in a pitiable state, and Frodo's threat had quite unnerved him. It
was not easy to get any clear account out of him, amid his mumblings and
squeakings, and the frequent interruptions in which he crawled on the floor and
begged them both to be kind to 'poor little Smeagol'. After a while he grew a little
calmer, and Frodo gathered bit by bit that, if a traveller followed the road that turned
west of Ephel Duath, he would come in time to a crossing in a circle of dark trees.
On the right a road went down to Osgiliath and the bridges of the Anduin; in the
middle the road went on southwards.
 'On, on, on,' said Gollum. 'We never went that way, but they say it goes a hundred
leagues, until you can see the Great Water that is never still. There are lots of fishes
there, and big birds eat fishes: nice birds; but we never went there, alas no! we never
had a chance. And further still there are more lands, they say, but the Yellow Face is
very hot there, and there are seldom any clouds, and the men are fierce and have
dark faces. We do not want to see that land.'
 'No!' said Frodo. 'But do not wander from your road. What of the third turning?'
 'O yes, O yes, there is a third way,' said Gollum. 'That is the road to the left. At
once it begins to climb up, up, winding and climbing back towards the tall shadows.
When it turns round the black rock, you'll see it, suddenly you'll see it above you, and
you'll want to hide.'
 'See it, see it? What will you see?'
 'The old fortress, very old, very horrible now. We used to hear tales from the South,
when Smeagol was young, long ago. O yes, we used to tell lots of tales in the
evening, sitting by the banks of the Great River, in the willow-lands, when the River
was younger too, gollum, gollum.' He began to weep and mutter. The hobbits waited
patiently.
 'Tales out of the South,' Gollum went on again, 'about the tall Men with the shining
eyes, and their houses like hills of stone, and the silver crown of their King and his
 164
White Tree: wonderful tales. They built very tall towers, and one they raised was
silver-white, and in it there was a stone like the Moon, and round it were great white
walls. O yes, there were many tales about the Tower of the Moon.'
 'That would be Minas Ithil that Isildur the son of Elendil built,' said Frodo. 'It was
Isildur who cut off the finger of the Enemy.'
 'Yes, He has only four on the Black Hand, but they are enough,' said Gollum
shuddering. 'And He hated Isildur's city.'
 'What does he not hate?' said Frodo. 'But what has the Tower of the Moon to do
with us?'
 'Well, master, there it was and there it is: the tall tower and the white houses and
the wall; but not nice now, not beautiful. He conquered it long ago. It is a very terrible
place now. Travellers shiver when they see it, they creep out of sight, they avoid its
shadow. But master will have to go that way. That is the only other way, For the
mountains are lower there, and the old road goes up and up, until it reaches a dark
pass at the top, and then it goes down, down, again – to Gorgoroth.' His voice sank
to a whisper and he shuddered.
 'But how will that help us?' asked Sam. 'Surely the Enemy knows all about his own
mountains, and that road will be guarded as close as this? The tower isn't empty, is
it?'
 'O no, not empty!' whispered Gollum. 'It seems empty, but it isn't, O no! Very
dreadful things live there. Orcs, yes always Orcs; but worse things, worse things live
there too. The road climbs right under the shadow of the walls and passes the gate.
Nothing moves on the road that they don't know about. The things inside know: the
Silent Watchers.'
 'So that's your advice is it,' said Sam, 'that we should go another long march south,
to find ourselves in the same fix or a worse one, when we get there, if we ever do?'
 'No, no indeed,' said Gollum. 'Hobbits must see, must try to understand. He does
not expect attack that way. His Eye is all round, but it attends more to some places
than to others. He can't see everything all at once, not yet. You see, He has
conquered all the country west of the Shadowy Mountains down to the River, and He
holds the bridges now. He thinks no one can come to the Moontower without fighting
big battle at the bridges, or getting lots of boats which they cannot hide and He will
know about.'
 'You seem to know a lot about what He's doing and thinking,' said Sam. 'Have you
been talking to Him lately? Or just hobnobbing with Orcs?'
 'Not nice hobbit, not sensible,' said Gollum, giving Sam an angry glance and
turning to Frodo. 'Smeagol has talked to Orcs, yes of course, before he met master,
and to many peoples: he has walked very far. And what he says now many peoples
are saying. It's here in the North that the big danger is for Him, and for us. He will
come out of the Black Gate one day, one day soon. That is the only way big armies
can come. But away down west He is not afraid, and there are the Silent Watchers.'
 'Just so!' said Sam, not to be put off. 'And so we are to walk up and knock at their
gate and ask if we're on the right road for Mordor? Or are they too silent to answer?
It's not sense. We might as well do it here, and save ourselves a long tramp.'
 'Don't make jokes about it,' hissed Gollum. 'It isn't funny, O no! Not amusing. It's
not sense to try and get into Mordor at all. But if master says I must go or I will go,
then he must try some way. But he must not go to the terrible city, O no, of course
not. That is where Smeagol helps, nice Smeagol, though no one tells him what it is
all about. Smeagol helps again. He found it. He knows it.'
 'What did you find?' asked Frodo.
 165
 Gollum crouched down and his voice sank to a whisper again. 'A little path leading
up into the mountains: and then a stair, a narrow stair, O yes, very long and narrow.
And then more stairs. And then' – his voice sank even lower – 'a tunnel, a dark
tunnel; and at last a little cleft, and a path high above the main pass. It was that way
that Smeagol got out of the darkness. But it was years ago. The path may have
vanished now; but perhaps not, perhaps not.'
 'I don't like the sound of it at all,' said Sam. 'Sounds too easy at any rate in the
telling. If that path is still there, it'll be guarded too. Wasn't it guarded, Gollum?' As he
said this, he caught or fancied he caught a green gleam in Gollum's eye. Gollum
muttered but did not reply.
 'Is it not guarded?' asked Frodo sternly. 'And did you escape out of the darkness,
Smeagol? Were you not rather permitted to depart upon an errand? That at least is
what Aragorn thought, who found you by the Dead Marshes some years ago.'
 'It's a lie!' hissed Gollum, and an evil light came into his eyes at the naming of
Aragorn. 'He lied on me, yes he did. I did escape, all by my poor self. Indeed I was
told to seek for the Precious; and I have searched and searched, of course I have.
But not for the Black One. The Precious was ours, it was mine I tell you. I did
escape.'
 Frodo felt a strange certainty that in this matter Gollum was for once not so far
from the truth as might be suspected; that he had somehow found a way out of
Mordor, and at least believed that it was by his own cunning. For one thing, he noted
that Gollum used I, and that seemed usually to be a sign, on its rare appearances.
that some remnants of old truth and sincerity were for the moment on top. But even if
Gollum could be trusted on this point, Frodo did not forget the wiles of the Enemy.
The 'escape' may have been allowed or arranged, and well known in the Dark
Tower. And in any case Gollum was plainly keeping a good deal back.
 'I ask you again,' he said, 'is not this secret way guarded?'
 But the name of Aragorn had put Gollum into a sullen mood. He had all the injured
air of a liar suspected when for once he has told the truth, or part of it. He did not
answer.
 'Is it not guarded?' Frodo repeated.
 'Yes, yes, perhaps. No safe places in this country,' said Gollum sulkily. 'No safe
places. But master must try it or go home. No other way.' They could not get him to
say more. The name of the perilous place and the high pass he could not tell, or
would not.
 Its name was Cirith Ungol, a name of dreadful rumour. Aragorn could perhaps
have told them that name and its significance: Gandalf would have warned them. But
they were alone, and Aragorn was far away, and Gandalf stood amid the ruin of
Isengard and strove with Saruman, delayed by treason. Yet even as he spoke his
last words to Saruman, and the palantir crashed in fire upon the steps of Orthanc, his
thought was ever upon Frodo and Samwise, over the long leagues his mind sought
for them in hope and pity.
 Maybe Frodo felt it, not knowing it, as he had upon Amon Hen, even though he
believed that Gandalf was gone, gone for ever into the shadow in Moria far away. He
sat upon the ground for a long while, silent, his head bowed, striving to recall all that
Gandalf had said to him. But for this choice he could recall no counsel. Indeed
Gandalf's guidance had been taken from them too soon, too soon, while the Dark
Land was still very far away. How they should enter it at the last Gandalf had not
said. Perhaps he could not say. Into the stronghold of the Enemy in the North, into
Dol Guldur, he had once ventured. But into Mordor, to the Mountain of Fire and to
 166
Barad-dur, since the Dark Lord rose in power again, had he ever journeyed there?
Frodo did not think so. And here he was a little halfling from the Shire, a simple
hobbit of the quiet countryside expected to find a way where the great ones could not
go, or dared not go. It was an evil fate. But he had taken it on himself in his own
sitting-room in the far-off spring of another year, so remote now that it was like a
chapter in a story of the world's youth, when the Trees of Silver and Gold were still in
bloom. This was an evil choice. Which way should he choose? And if both led to
terror and death, what good lay in choice?
 The day drew on. A deep silence fell upon the little grey hollow where they lay, so
near to the borders of the land of fear: a silence that could be felt, as if it were a thick
veil that cut them off from all the world about them. Above them was a dome of pale
sky barred with fleeting smoke, but it seemed high and far away, as if seen through
great deeps of air heavy with brooding thought.
 Not even an eagle poised against the sun would have marked the hobbits sitting
there, under the weight of doom, silent, not moving, shrouded in their thin grey
cloaks. For a moment he might have paused to consider Gollum, a tiny figure
sprawling on the ground: there perhaps lay the famished skeleton of some child of
Men, its ragged garment still clinging to it, its long arms and legs almost bone-white
and bone-thin: no flesh worth a peck.
 Frodo's head was bowed over his knees, but Sam leaned back, with hands behind
his head, staring out of his hood at the empty sky. At least for a long while it was
empty. Then presently Sam thought he saw a dark bird-like figure wheel into the
circle of his sight, and hover, and then wheel away again. Two more followed, and
then a fourth. They were very small to look at, yet he knew, somehow, that they were
huge, with a vast stretch of pinion, flying at a great height. He covered his eyes and
bent forward, cowering. The same warning fear was on him as he had felt in the
presence of the Black Riders, the helpless horror that had come with the cry in the
wind and the shadow on the moon, though now it was not so crushing or compelling:
the menace was more remote. But menace it was. Frodo felt it too. His thought was
broken. He stirred and shivered, but he did not look up. Gollum huddled himself
together like a cornered spider. The winged shapes wheeled, and stooped swiftly
down, speeding back to Mordor.
 Sam took a deep breath. 'The Riders are about again, up in the air,' he said in a
hoarse whisper. 'I saw them. Do you think they could see us? They were very high
up. And if they are Black Riders same as before, then they can't see much by
daylight, can they?'
 'No, perhaps not,' said Frodo. 'But their steeds could see. And these winged
creatures that they ride on now, they can probably see more than any other creature.
They are like great carrion birds. They are looking for something: the Enemy is on
the watch, I fear.'
 The feeling of dread passed, but the enfolding silence was broken. For some time
they had been cut off from the world, as if in an invisible island; now they were laid
bare again, peril had returned. But still Frodo did not speak to Gollum or make his
choice. His eyes were closed, as if he were dreaming, or looking inward into his
heart and memory. At last he stirred and stood up, and it seemed that he was about
to speak and to decide. But 'hark!' he said. 'What is that?'
 A new fear was upon them. They heard singing and hoarse shouting. At first it
seemed a long way off, but it drew nearer: it was coming towards them. It leaped into
all their minds that the Black Wings had spied them and had sent armed soldiers to
seize them: no speed seemed too great for these terrible servants of Sauron. They
 167
crouched, listening. The voices and the clink of weapons and harness were very
close. Frodo and Sam loosened their small swords in their sheaths. Flight was
impossible.
 Gollum rose slowly and crawled insect-like to the lip of the hollow. Very cautiously
he raised himself inch by inch, until he could peer over it between two broken points
of stone. He remained there without moving for some time, making no sound.
Presently the voices began to recede again, and then they slowly faded away. Far
off a horn blew on the ramparts of the Morannon. Then quietly Gollum drew back
and slipped down into the hollow.
 'More Men going to Mordor,' he said in a low voice. 'Dark faces. We have not seen
Men like these before, no, Smeagol has not. They are fierce. They have black eyes,
and long black hair, and gold rings in their ears; yes, lots of beautiful gold. And some
have red paint on their cheeks, and red cloaks; and their flags are red, and the tips of
their spears; and they have round shields, yellow and black with big spikes. Not nice;
very cruel wicked Men they look. Almost as bad as Orcs, and much bigger. Smeagol
thinks they have come out of the South beyond the Great River's end: they came up
that road. They have passed on to the Black Gate; but more may follow. Always
more people coming to Mordor. One day all the peoples will be inside.'
 'Were there any oliphaunts?' asked Sam, forgetting his fear in his eagerness for
news of strange places.
 'No, no oliphaunts. What are oliphaunts?' said Gollum.
 Sam stood up, putting his hands behind his back (as he always did when 'speaking
poetry'), and began:
Grey as a mouse,
Big as a house.
Nose like a snake,
I make the earth shake,
As I tramp through the grass;
Trees crack as I pass.
With horns in my mouth
I walk in the South,
Flapping big ears.
Beyond count of years
I stump round and round,
Never lie on the ground,
Not even to die.
Oliphaunt am I,
Biggest of all,
Huge, old, and tall.
If ever you'd met me
You wouldn't forget me.
If you never do,
You won't think I'm true;
But old Oliphaunt am I,
And I never lie.
 'That,' said Sam, when he had finished reciting, 'that's a rhyme we have in the
Shire. Nonsense maybe, and maybe not. But we have our tales too, and news out of
the South, you know. In the old days hobbits used to go on their travels now and
 168
again. Not that many ever came back, and not that all they said was believed: news
from Bree, and not sure as Shiretalk, as the sayings go. But I've heard tales of the
big folk down away in the Sunlands. Swertings we call 'em in our tales; and they ride
on oliphaunts, 'tis said, when they fight. They put houses and towers on the
oliphauntses backs and all, and the oliphaunts throw rocks and trees at one another.
So when you said "Men out of the South, all in red and gold;" I said "were there any
oliphaunts?" For if there was, I was going to take a look, risk or no. But now I don't
suppose I'll ever see an oliphaunt. Maybe there ain't no such a beast.' He sighed.
 'No, no oliphaunts,' said Gollum again. 'Smeagol has not heard of them. He does
not want to see them. He does not want them to be. Smeagol wants to go away from
here and hide somewhere safer. Smeagol wants master to go. Nice master, won't he
come with Smeagol?'
 Frodo stood up. He had laughed in the midst of all his cares when Sam trotted out
the old fireside rhyme of Oliphaunt, and the laugh had released him from hesitation.
'I wish we had a thousand oliphaunts with Gandalf on a white one at their head,' he
said. 'Then we'd break a way into this evil land, perhaps. But we've not; just our own
tired legs, that's all. Well, Smeagol, the third turn may turn the best. I will come with
you.'
 'Good master, wise master, nice master!' cried Gollum in delight, patting Frodo's
knees. 'Good master! Then rest now, nice hobbits, under the shadow of the stones,
close under the stones! Rest and lie quiet, till the Yellow Face goes away. Then we
can go quickly. Soft and quick as shadows we must be!'
Chapter 4
Of Herbs and Stewed Rabbit
 For the few hours of daylight that were left they rested, shifting into the shade as
the sun moved, until at last the shadow of the western rim of their dell grew long, and
darkness filled all the hollow. Then they ate a little, and drank sparingly. Gollum ate
nothing, but he accepted water gladly.
 'Soon get more now,' he said, licking his lips. 'Good water runs down in streams to
the Great River, nice water in the lands we are going to. Smeagol will get food there
too, perhaps. He's very hungry, yes, gollum!' He set his two large flat hands on his
shrunken belly, and a pale green light came into his eyes.
 The dusk was deep when at length they set out, creeping over the westward rim of
the dell, and fading like ghosts into the broken country on the borders of the road.
The moon was now three nights from the full, but it did not climb over the mountains
until nearly midnight, and the early night was very dark. A single red light burned
high up in the Towers of the Teeth, but otherwise no sign could be seen or heard of
the sleepless watch on the Morannon.
 For many miles the red eye seemed to stare at them as they fled, stumbling
through a barren stony country. They did not dare to take the road, but they kept it
on their left, following its line as well as they could at a little distance. At last, when
night was growing old and they were already weary, for they had taken only one
short rest, the eye dwindled to a small fiery point and then vanished: they had turned
the dark northern shoulder of the lower mountains and were heading southwards.
 With hearts strangely lightened they now rested again, but not for long. They were
not going quick enough for Gollum. By his reckoning it was nearly thirty leagues from
the Morannon to the cross-roads above Osgiliath, and he hoped to cover that
distance in four journeys. So soon they struggled on once more, until the dawn
 169
began to spread slowly in the wide grey solitude. They had then walked almost eight
leagues; and the hobbits could not have gone any further, even if they had dared.
 The growing light revealed to them a land already, less barren and ruinous. The
mountains still loomed up ominously on their left, but near at hand they could see the
southward road, now bearing away from the black roots of the hills and slanting
westwards. Beyond it were slopes covered with sombre trees like dark clouds, but all
about them lay a tumbled heathland, grown with ling and broom and cornel, and
other shrubs that they did not know. Here and there they saw knots of tall pine-trees.
The hearts of the hobbits rose again a little in spite of weariness: the air was fresh
and fragrant, and it reminded them of the uplands of the Northfarthing far away. It
seemed good to be reprieved, to walk in a land that had only been for a few years
under the dominion of the Dark Lord and was not yet fallen wholly into decay. But
they did not forget their danger, nor the Black Gate that was still all too near, hidden
though it was behind the gloomy heights. They looked about for a hiding-place where
they could shelter from evil eyes while the light lasted.
 The day passed uneasily. They lay deep in the heather and counted out the slow
hours, in which there seemed little change; for they were still under the shadows of
the Ephel Duath, and the sun was veiled. Frodo slept at times, deeply and
peacefully, either trusting Gollum or too tired to trouble about him; but Sam found it
difficult to do more than doze, even when Gollum was plainly fast asleep, whiffling
and twitching in his secret dreams. Hunger, perhaps, more than mistrust kept him
wakeful: he had begun to long for a good homely meal, 'something hot out of the
pot'.
 As soon as the land faded into a formless grey under coming night, they started
out again. In a little while Gollum led them down on to the southward road; and after
that they went on more quickly, though the danger was greater. Their ears were
strained for the sound of hoof or foot on the road ahead, or following them from
behind; but the night passed, and they heard no sound of walker or rider.
 The road had been made in a long lost time: and for perhaps thirty miles below the
Morannon it had been newly repaired, but as it went south the wild encroached upon
it. The handiwork of Men of old could still be seen in its straight sure flight and level
course: now and again it cut its way through hillside slopes, or leaped over a stream
upon a wide shapely arch of enduring masonry; but at last all signs of stonework
faded, save for a broken pillar here and there, peering out of bushes at the side, or
old paving-stones still lurking amid weeds and moss. Heather and trees and bracken
scrambled down and overhung the banks, or sprawled out over the surface. It
dwindled at last to a country cart-road little used; but it did not wind: it held on its own
sure course and guided them by the swiftest way.
 So they passed into the northern marches of that land that Men once called Ithilien,
a fair country of climbing woods and swift-falling streams. The night became fine
under star and round moon, and it seemed to the hobbits that the fragrance of the air
grew as they went forward; and from the blowing and muttering of Gollum it seemed
that he noticed it too, and did not relish it. At the first signs of day they halted again.
They had come to the end of a long cutting, deep, and sheer-sided in the middle, by
which the road clove its way through a stony ridge. Now they climbed up the
westward bank and looked abroad.
 Day was opening in the sky, and they saw that the mountains were now much
further off, receding eastward in a long curve that was lost in the distance. Before
them, as they turned west, gentle slopes ran down into dim hazes far below. All
about them were small woods of resinous trees, fir and cedar and cypress, and other
 170
kinds unknown in the Shire, with wide glades among them; and everywhere there
was a wealth of sweet-smelling herbs and shrubs. The long journey from Rivendell
had brought them far south of their own land, but not until now in this more sheltered
region had the hobbits felt the change of clime. Here Spring was already busy about
them: fronds pierced moss and mould, larches were green-fingered, small flowers
were opening in the turf, birds were singing. Ithilien, the garden of Gondor now
desolate kept still a dishevelled dryad loveliness.
 South and west it looked towards the warm lower vales of Anduin, shielded from
the east by the Ephel Duath and yet not under the mountain-shadow, protected from
the north by the Emyn Muil, open to the southern airs and the moist winds from the
Sea far away. Many great trees grew there, planted long ago, falling into untended
age amid a riot of careless descendants; and groves and thickets there were of
tamarisk and pungent terebinth, of olive and of bay; and there were junipers and
myrtles; and thymes that grew in bushes, or with their woody creeping stems
mantled in deep tapestries the hidden stones; sages of many kinds putting forth blue
flowers, or red, or pale green; and marjorams and new-sprouting parsleys, and many
herbs of forms and scents beyond the garden-lore of Sam. The grots and rocky walls
were already starred with saxifrages and stonecrops. Primeroles and anemones
were awake in the filbert-brakes; and asphodel and many lily-flowers nodded their
half-opened heads in the grass: deep green grass beside the pools, where falling
streams halted in cool hollows on their journey down to Anduin.
 The travellers turned their backs on the road and went downhill. As they walked,
brushing their way through bush and herb, sweet odours rose about them. Gollum
coughed and retched; but the hobbits breathed deep, and suddenly Sam laughed,
for heart's ease not for jest. They followed a stream that went quickly down before
them. Presently it brought them to a small clear lake in a shallow dell: it lay in the
broken ruins of an ancient stone basin, the carven rim of which was almost wholly
covered with mosses and rose-brambles; iris-swords stood in ranks about it, and
water-lily leaves floated on its dark gently-rippling surface; but it was deep and fresh,
and spilled ever softly out over a stony lip at the far end.
 Here they washed themselves and drank their fill at the in-falling freshet. Then they
sought for a resting-place, and a hiding-place: for this land, fair-seeming still, was
nonetheless now territory of the Enemy. They had not come very far from the road,
and yet even in so short a space they had seen scars of the old wars, and the newer
wounds made by the Orcs and other foul servants of the Dark Lord: a pit of
uncovered filth and refuse; trees hewn down wantonly and left to die, with evil runes
or the fell sign of the Eye cut in rude strokes on their bark.
 Sam scrambling below the outfall of the lake, smelling and touching the unfamiliar
plants and trees, forgetful for the moment of Mordor, was reminded suddenly of their
ever-present peril. He stumbled on a ring still scorched by fire, and in the midst of it
he found a pile of charred and broken bones and skulls. The swift growth of the wild
with briar and eglantine and trailing clematis was already drawing a veil over this
place of dreadful feast and slaughter; but it was not ancient. He hurried back to his
companions, but he said nothing: the bones were best left in peace and not pawed
and routed by Gollum.
 'Let's find a place to lie up in,' he said. 'Not lower down. Higher up for me.'
 A little way back above the lake they found a deep brown bed of last year's fern.
Beyond it was a thicket of dark-leaved bay-trees climbing up a steep bank that was
crowned with old cedars. Here they decided to rest and pass the day, which already
promised to be bright and warm. A good day for strolling on their way along the
 171
groves and glades of Ithilien; but though Orcs may shun the sunlight, there were too
many places here where they could lie hid and watch; and other evil eyes were
abroad: Sauron had many servants. Gollum, in any case, would not move under the
Yellow Face. Soon it would look over the dark ridges of the Ephel Duath, and he
would faint and cower in the light and heat.
 Sam had been giving earnest thought to food as they marched. Now that the
despair of the impassable Gate was behind him, he did not feel so inclined as his
master to take no thought for their livelihood beyond the end of their errand; and
anyway it seemed wiser to him to save the waybread of the Elves for worse times
ahead. Six days or more had passed since he reckoned that they had only a bare
supply for three weeks.
 'If we reach the Fire in that time, we'll be lucky at this rate!' he thought. 'And we
might be wanting to get back. We might!'
 Besides, at the end of a long night-march, and after bathing and drinking, he felt
even more hungry than usual. A supper, or a breakfast, by the fire in the old kitchen
at Bagshot Row was what he really wanted. An idea struck him and he turned to
Gollum. Gollum had just begun to sneak off on his own, and he was crawling away
on all fours through the fern.
 'Hi! Gollum!' said Sam. 'Where are you going? Hunting? Well see here, old noser,
you don't like our food, and I'd not be sorry for a change myself. Your new motto's
always ready to help. Could you find anything fit for a hungry hobbit?'
 'Yes, perhaps, yes,' said Gollum. 'Smeagol always helps, if they asks – if they asks
nicely.'
 'Right!' said Sam 'I does ask. And if that isn't nice enough, I begs.'
 Gollum disappeared. He was away some time, and Frodo after a few mouthfuls of
lembas settled deep into the brown fern and went to sleep. Sam looked at him. The
early daylight was only just creeping down into the shadows under the trees, but he
saw his master's face very clearly, and his hands, too, lying at rest on the ground
beside him. He was reminded suddenly of Frodo as he had lain, asleep in the house
of Elrond, after his deadly wound. Then as he had kept watch Sam had noticed that
at times a light seemed to be shining faintly within; but now the light was even
clearer and stronger. Frodo's face was peaceful, the marks of fear and care had left
it; but it looked old, old and beautiful, as if the chiselling of the shaping years was
now revealed in many fine lines that had before been hidden, though the identity of
the face was not changed. Not that Sam Gamgee put it that way to himself. He
shook his head, as if finding words useless, and murmured: 'I love him. He's like that,
and sometimes it shines through, somehow. But I love him, whether or no.'
 Gollum returned quietly and peered over Sam's shoulder. Looking at Frodo, he
shut his eyes and crawled away without a sound. Sam came to him a moment later
and found him chewing something and muttering to himself. On the ground beside
him lay two small rabbits, which he was beginning to eye greedily.
 'Smeagol always helps,' he said. 'He has brought rabbits, nice rabbits. But master
has gone to sleep, and perhaps Sam wants to sleep. Doesn't want rabbits now?
Smeagol tries to help, but he can't catch things all in a minute.'
 Sam, however, had no objection to rabbit at all, and said so. At least not to cooked
rabbit. All hobbits, of course, can cook, for they begin to learn the art before their
letters (which many never reach): but Sam was a good cook, even by hobbit
reckoning, and he had done a good deal of the camp-cooking on their travels, when
there was a chance. He still hopefully carried some of his gear in his pack: a small
tinder-box, two small shallow pans, the smaller fitting into the larger; inside them a
 172
wooden spoon, a short two-pronged fork and some skewers were stowed; and
hidden at the bottom of the pack in a flat wooden box a dwindling treasure, some
salt. But he needed a fire, and other things besides. He thought for a bit, while he
took out his knife, cleaned and whetted it, and began to dress the rabbits. He was
not going to leave Frodo alone asleep even for a few minutes.
 'Now, Gollum,' he said, 'I've another job for you. Go and fill these pans with water,
and bring 'em back!'
 'Smeagol will fetch water, yes,' said Gollum. 'But what does the hobbit want all that
water for? He has drunk, he has washed.'
 'Never you mind,' said Sam. 'If you can't guess, you'll soon find out. And the sooner
you fetch the water, the sooner you'll learn. Don't you damage one of my pans, or I'll
carve you into mincemeat.'
 While Gollum was away Sam took another look at Frodo. He was still sleeping
quietly, but Sam was now struck most by the leanness of his face and hands. 'Too
thin and drawn he is,' he muttered. 'Not right for a hobbit. If I can get these coneys
cooked, I'm going to wake him up.'
 Sam gathered a pile of the driest fern, and then scrambled up the bank collecting a
bundle of twigs and broken wood; the fallen branch of a cedar at the top gave him a
good supply. He cut out some turves at the foot of the bank just outside the fernbrake, and made a
shallow hole and laid his fuel in it. Being handy with flint and
tinder he soon had a small blaze going. It made little or no smoke but gave off an
aromatic scent. He was just stooping over his fire, shielding it and building it up with
heavier wood, when Gollum returned, carrying the pans carefully and grumbling to
himself.
 He set the pans down, and then suddenly saw what Sam was doing. He gave a
thin hissing shriek, and seemed to be both frightened and angry. 'Ach! Sss – no!' he
cried. 'No! Silly hobbits, foolish, yes foolish! They mustn't do it!'
 'Mustn't do what?' asked Sam in surprise.
 'Not make the nassty red tongues,' hissed Gollum. 'Fire, fire! It's dangerous, yes it
is. It burns, it kills. And it will bring enemies, yes it will.'
 'I don't think so,' said Sam. 'Don't see why it should, if you don't put wet stuff on it
and make a smother. But if it does, it does. I'm going to risk it, anyhow. I'm going to
stew these coneys.'
 'Stew the rabbits!' squealed Gollum in dismay. 'Spoil beautiful meat Smeagol
saved for you, poor hungry Smeagol! What for? What for, silly hobbit? They are
young, they are tender, they are nice. Eat them, eat them!' He clawed at the nearest
rabbit, already skinned and lying by the fire.
 'Now, now!' said Sam. 'Each to his own fashion. Our bread chokes you, and raw
coney chokes me. If you give me a coney, the coney's mine, see, to cook, if I have a
mind. And I have. You needn't watch me. Go and catch another and eat it as you
fancy – somewhere private and out o' my sight. Then you won't see the fire, and I
shan't see you, and we'll both be the happier. I'll see the fire don't smoke, if that's
any comfort to you.'
 Gollum withdrew grumbling, and crawled into the fern. Sam busied himself with his
pans. 'What a hobbit needs with coney,' he said to himself, 'is some herbs and roots,
especially taters – not to mention bread. Herbs we can manage, seemingly.'
 'Gollum!' he called softly. 'Third time pays for all. I want some herbs.' Gollum's
head peeped out of the fern, but his looks were neither helpful nor friendly. 'A few
bay-leaves, some thyme and sage, will do – before the water boils,' said Sam.
 'No!' said Gollum. 'Smeagol is not pleased. And Smeagol doesn't like smelly
 173
leaves. He doesn't eat grasses or roots, no precious, not till he's starving or very
sick, poor Smeagol. '
 'Smeagol'll get into real true hot water, when this water boils, if he don't do as he's
asked,' growled Sam. 'Sam'll put his head in it, yes precious. And I'd make him look
for turnips and carrots, and taters too, if it was the time o' the year. I'll bet there's all
sorts of good things running wild in this country. I'd give a lot for half a dozen taters.'
 'Smeagol won't go, O no precious, not this time,' hissed Gollum. 'He's frightened,
and he's very tired, and this hobbit's not nice, not nice at all. Smeagol won't grub for
roots and carrotses and – taters. What's taters, precious, eh, what's taters?
 'Po-ta-toes,' said Sam. 'The Gaffer's delight, and rare good ballast for an empty
belly. But you won't find any, so you needn't look. But be good Smeagol and fetch
me the herbs, and I'll think better of you. What's more, if you turn over a new leaf,
and keep it turned, I'll cook you some taters one of these days, I will: fried fish and
chips served by S. Gamgee. You couldn't say no to that.'
 'Yes, yes we could. Spoiling nice fish, scorching it. Give me fish now, and keep
nassty chips!'
 'Oh you're hopeless,' said Sam. 'Go to sleep!'
 In the end he had to find what he wanted for himself; but he did not have to go far,
not out of sight of the place where his master lay, still sleeping. For a while Sam sat
musing, and tending the fire till the water boiled. The daylight grew and the air
became warm; the dew faded off turf and leaf. Soon the rabbits cut up lay simmering
in their pans with the bunched herbs. Almost Sam fell asleep as the time went by. He
let them stew for close on an hour, testing them now and again with his fork, and
tasting the broth.
 When he thought all was ready he lifted the pans off the fire, and crept along to
Frodo. Frodo half opened his eyes as Sam stood over him, and then he wakened
from his dreaming: another gentle, unrecoverable dream of peace.
 'Hullo, Sam!' he said. 'Not resting? Is anything wrong? What is the time?'
 'About a couple of hours after daybreak,' said Sam, 'and nigh on half past eight by
Shire clocks, maybe. But nothing's wrong. Though it ain't quite what I'd call right: no
stock, no onions, no taters. I've got a bit of a stew for you, and some broth, Mr.
Frodo. Do you good. You'll have to sup it in your mug; or straight from the pan, when
it's cooled a bit. I haven't brought no bowls, nor nothing proper.'
 Frodo yawned and stretched. 'You should have been resting Sam,' he said. 'And
lighting a fire was dangerous in these parts. But I do feel hungry. Hmm! Can I smell it
from here? What have you stewed?'
 'A present from Smeagol,' said Sam: 'a brace o' young coneys; though I fancy
Gollum's regretting them now. But there's nought to go with them but a few herbs.'
 Sam and his master sat just within the fern-brake and ate their stew from the pans,
sharing the old fork and spoon. They allowed themselves half a piece of the Elvish
waybread each. It seemed a feast.
 'Wheew! Gollum!' Sam called and whistled softly. 'Come on! Still time to change
your mind. There's some left, if you want to try stewed coney.' There was no answer.
 'Oh well, I suppose he's gone off to find something for himself. We'll finish it,' said
Sam.
 'And then you must take some sleep,' said Frodo.
 'Don't you drop off, while I'm nodding, Mr. Frodo. I don't feel too sure of him.
There's a good deal of Stinker – the bad Gollum, if you understand me – in him still,
and it's getting stronger again. Not but what I think he'd try to throttle me first now.
We don't see eye to eye, and he's not pleased with Sam, O no precious, not pleased
 174
at all.'
 They finished, and Sam went off to the stream to rinse his gear. As he stood up to
return, he looked back up the slope. At that moment he saw the sun rise out of the
reek, or haze, or dark shadow, or whatever it was, that lay ever to the east, and it
sent its golden beams down upon the trees and glades about him. Then he noticed a
thin spiral of blue-grey, smoke, plain to see as it caught the sunlight, rising from a
thicket above him. With a shock he realized that this was the smoke from his little
cooking-fire, which he had neglected to put out.
 'That won't do! Never thought it would show like that!' he muttered, and he started
to hurry back. Suddenly he halted and listened. Had he heard a whistle or not? Or
was it the call of some strange bird? If it was a whistle, it did not come from Frodo's
direction. There it went again from another place! Sam began to run as well as he
could uphill.
 He found that a small brand, burning away to its outer end, had kindled some fern
at the edge of the fire, and the fern blazing up had set the turves smouldering.
Hastily he stamped out what was left of the fire, scattered the ashes, and laid the
turves on the hole. Then he crept back to Frodo.
 'Did you hear a whistle, and what sounded like an answer?' he asked. 'A few
minutes back. I hope it was only a bird, but it didn't sound quite like that: more like
somebody mimicking a bird-call, I thought. And I'm afraid my bit of fire's been
smoking. Now if I've gone and brought trouble, I'll never forgive myself. Nor won't
have a chance, maybe!'
 'Hush!' whispered Frodo. 'I thought I heard voices.'
 The two hobbits trussed their small packs, put them on ready for flight, and then
crawled deeper into the fern. There they crouched listening.
 There was no doubt of the voices. They were speaking low and furtively, but they
were near, and coming nearer. Then quite suddenly one spoke clearly close at hand.
 'Here! Here is where the smoke came from!' it said. ''Twill be nigh at hand. In the
fern, no doubt. We shall have it like a coney in a trap. Then we shall learn what kind
of thing it is.'
 'Aye, and what it knows!' said a second voice.
 At once four men came striding through the fern from different directions. Since
flight and hiding were no longer possible, Frodo and Sam sprang to their feet, putting
back to back and whipping out their small swords.
 If they were astonished at what they saw, their captors were even more
astonished. Four tall Men stood there. Two had spears in their hands with broad
bright heads. Two had great bows, almost of their own height, and great quivers of
long green-feathered arrows. All had swords at their sides, and were clad in green
and brown of varied hues, as if the better to walk unseen in the glades of Ithilien.
Green gauntlets covered their hands, and their faces were hooded and masked with
green, except for their eyes, which were very keen and bright. At once Frodo thought
of Boromir, for these Men were like him in stature and bearing, and in their manner
of speech.
 'We have not found what we sought,' said one. 'But what have we found?'
 'Not Orcs,' said another, releasing the hilt of his sword, which he had seized when
he saw the glitter of Sting in Frodo's hand.
 'Elves?' said a third, doubtfully.
 'Nay! Not Elves,' said the fourth, the tallest, and as it appeared the chief among
them. 'Elves do not walk in Ithilien in these days. And Elves are wondrous fair to look
upon, or so 'tis said.'
 175
 'Meaning we're not, I take you,' said Sam. 'Thank you kindly. And when you've
finished discussing us, perhaps you'll say who you are, and why you can't let two
tired travellers rest.'
 The tall green man laughed grimly. 'I am Faramir, Captain of Gondor,' he said. 'But
there are no travellers in this land: only the servants of the Dark Tower, or of the
White.'
 'But we are neither,' said Frodo. 'And travellers we are, whatever Captain Faramir
may say.'
 'Then make haste to declare yourselves and your errand,' said Faramir. 'We have
a work to do, and this is no time or place for riddling or parleying. Come! Where is
the third of your company?'
 'The third?'
 'Yes, the skulking fellow that we saw with his nose in the pool down yonder. He
had an ill-favoured look. Some spying breed of Orc, I guess, or a creature of theirs.
But he gave us the slip by some fox-trick.'
 'I do not know where he is,' said Frodo. 'He is only a chance companion met upon
our road; and I am not answerable for him. If you come on him, spare him. Bring him
or send him to us. He is only a wretched gangrel creature, but I have him under my
care for a while. But as for us, we are Hobbits of the Shire, far to the North and West,
beyond many rivers. Frodo son of Drogo is my name, and with me is Samwise son of
Hamfast, a worthy hobbit in my service. We have come by long ways – out of
Rivendell, or Imladris as some call it.' Here Faramir started and grew intent. 'Seven
companions we had: one we lost at Moria, the others we left at Parth Galen above
Rauros: two of my kin; a Dwarf there was also, and an Elf, and two Men. They were
Aragorn; and Boromir, who said that he came out of Minas Tirith, a city in the South.'
 'Boromir!' all the four men exclaimed.
 'Boromir son of the Lord Denethor?' said Faramir, and a strange stern look came
into his face. 'You came with him? That is news indeed, if it be true. Know, little
strangers, that Boromir son of Denethor was High Warden of the White Tower, and
our Captain-General: sorely do we miss him. Who are you then, and what had you to
do with him? Be swift, for the Sun is climbing!'
 'Are the riddling words known to you that Boromir brought to Rivendell?' Frodo
replied.
Seek for the Sword that was Broken.
In Imladris it dwells.
 'The words are known indeed,' said Faramir in astonishment. 'It is some token of
your truth that you also know them.'
 'Aragorn whom I named is the bearer of the Sword that was Broken,' said Frodo.
'And we are the Halflings that the rhyme spoke of.'
 'That I see,' said Faramir thoughtfully. 'Or I see that it might be so. And what is
Isildur's Bane?'
 'That is hidden,' answered Frodo. 'Doubtless it will be made clear in time.'
 'We must learn more of this,' said Faramir, 'and know what brings you so far east
under the shadow of yonder–,' he pointed and said no name. 'But not now. We have
business in hand. You are in peril, and you would not have gone far by field or road
this day. There will be hard handstrokes nigh at hand ere the day is full. Then death,
or swift flight bark to Anduin. I will leave two to guard you, for your good and for
mine. Wise man trusts not to chance-meeting on the road in this land. If I return, I will
 176
speak more with you.'
 'Farewell!' said Frodo, bowing low. 'Think what you will, I am a friend of all enemies
of the One Enemy. We would go with you, if we halfling folk could hope to serve you,
such doughty men and strong as you seem, and if my errand permitted it. May the
light shine on your swords!'
 'The Halflings are courteous folk, whatever else they be,' said Faramir. 'Farewell!'
 The hobbits sat down again, but they said nothing to one another of their thoughts
and doubts. Close by, just under the dappling shadow of the dark bay-trees, two men
remained on guard. They took off their masks now and again to cool them, as the
day-heat grew, and Frodo saw that they were goodly men, pale-skinned, dark of hair,
with grey eyes and faces sad and proud. They spoke together in soft voices, at first
using the Common Speech, but after the manner of older days, and then changing to
another language of their own. To his amazement, as he listened Frodo became
aware that it was the Elven-tongue that they spoke, or one but little different; and he
looked at them with wonder, for he knew then that they must be Dunedain of the
South, men of the line of the Lords of Westernesse.
 After a while he spoke to them; but they were slow and cautious in answering.
They named themselves Mablung and Damrod, soldiers of Gondor, and they were
Rangers of Ithilien; for they were descended from folk who lived in Ithilien at one
time, before it was overrun. From such men the Lord Denethor chose his forayers,
who crossed the Anduin secretly (how or where, they would not say) to harry the
Orcs and other enemies that roamed between the Ephel Duath and the River.
 'It is close on ten leagues hence to the east-shore of Anduin,' said Mablung, 'and
we seldom come so far afield. But we have a new errand on this journey: we come to
ambush the Men of Harad. Curse them!'
 'Aye, curse the Southrons!' said Damrod. ''Tis said that there were dealings of old
between Gondor and the kingdoms of the Harad in the Far South; though there was
never friendship. In those days our bounds were away south beyond the mouths of
Anduin, and Umbar, the nearest of their realms, acknowledged our sway. But that is
long since. 'Tis many lives of Men since any passed to or fro between us. Now of late
we have learned that the Enemy has been among them, and they are gone over to
Him, or back to Him – they were ever ready to His will – as have so many also in the
East. I doubt not that the days of Gondor are numbered, and the walls of Minas Tirith
are doomed, so great is His strength and malice.'
 'But still we will not sit idle and let Him do all as He would,' said Mablung. 'These
cursed Southrons come now marching up the ancient roads to swell the hosts of the
Dark Tower. Yea, up the very roads that craft of Gondor made. And they go ever
more heedlessly, we learn, thinking that the power of their new master is great
enough, so that the mere shadow of His hills will protect them. We come to teach
them another lesson. Great strength of them was reported to us some days ago,
marching north. One of their regiments is due by our reckoning to pass by, some
time ere noon-up on the road above, where it passes through the cloven way. The
road may pass, but they shall not! Not while Faramir is Captain. He leads now in all
perilous ventures. But his life is charmed, or fate spares him for some other end.'
 Their talk died down into a listening silence. All seemed still and watchful. Sam,
crouched by the edge of the fern-brake, peered out. With his keen hobbit-eyes he
saw that many more Men were about. He could see them stealing up the slopes,
singly or in long files, keeping always to the shade of grove or thicket, or crawling,
hardly visible in their brown and green raiment, through grass and brake. All were
hooded and masked, and had gauntlets on their hands, and were armed like Faramir
 177
and his companions. Before long they had all passed and vanished. The sun rose till
it neared the South. The shadows shrank.
 'I wonder where that dratted Gollum is?' thought Sam, as he crawled back into
deeper shade. 'He stands a fair chance of being spitted for an Orc, or of being
roasted by the Yellow Face. But I fancy he'll look after himself.' He lay down beside
Frodo and began to doze.
 He woke, thinking that he had heard horns blowing. He sat up. It was now high
noon. The guards stood alert and tense in the shadow of the trees. Suddenly the
horns rang out louder and beyond mistake from above, over the top of the slope.
Sam thought that he heard cries and wild shouting also, but the sound was faint, as if
it came out of some distant cave. Then presently the noise of fighting broke out near
at hand, just above their hiding-place. He could hear plainly the ringing grate of steel
on steel, the clang of sword on iron cap, the dull beat of blade on shield; men were
yelling and screaming, and one clear loud voice was calling Gondor! Gondor!
 'It sounds like a hundred blacksmiths all smithying together,' said Sam to Frodo.
'They're as near as I want them now.'
 But the noise grew closer. 'They are coming!' cried Damrod. 'See! Some of the
Southrons have broken from the trap and are flying from the road. There they go!
Our men after them, and the Captain leading.'
 Sam, eager to see more, went now and joined the guards. He scrambled a little
way up into one of the larger of the bay-trees. For a moment he caught a glimpse of
swarthy men in red running down the slope some way off with green-clad warriors
leaping after them, hewing them down as they fled. Arrows were thick in the air.
Then suddenly straight over the rim of their sheltering bank, a man fell, crashing
through the slender trees, nearly on top of them. He came to rest in the fern a few
feet away, face downward, green arrow-feathers sticking from his neck below a
golden collar. His scarlet robes were tattered, his corslet of overlapping brazen
plates was rent and hewn, his black plaits of hair braided with gold were drenched
with blood. His brown hand still clutched the hilt of a broken sword.
 It was Sam's first view of a battle of Men against Men, and he did not like it much.
He was glad that he could not see the dead face. He wondered what the man's
name was and where he came from; and if he was really evil of heart, or what lies or
threats had led him on the long march from his home; and if he would not really
rather have stayed there in peace – all in a flash of thought which was quickly driven
from his mind. For just as Mablung stepped towards the fallen body, there was a new
noise. Great crying and shouting. Amidst it Sam heard a shrill bellowing or
trumpeting. And then a great thudding and bumping. like huge rams dinning on the
ground.
 'Ware! Ware!' cried Damrod to his companion. 'May the Valar turn him aside!
Mumak! Mumak!'
 To his astonishment and terror, and lasting delight, Sam saw a vast shape crash
out of the trees and come careering down the slope. Big as a house, much bigger
than a house, it looked to him, a grey-clad moving hill. Fear and wonder, maybe,
enlarged him in the hobbit's eyes, but the Mumak of Harad was indeed a beast of
vast bulk, and the like of him does not walk now in Middle-earth; his kin that live still
in latter days are but memories of his girth and majesty. On he came, straight
towards the watchers, and then swerved aside in the nick of time, passing only a few
yards away, rocking the ground beneath their feet: his great legs like trees,
enormous sail-like ears spread out, long snout upraised like a huge serpent about to
strike. his small red eyes raging. His upturned hornlike tusks were bound with bands
 178
of gold and dripped with blood. His trappings of scarlet and gold flapped about him in
wild tatters. The ruins of what seemed a very war-tower lay upon his heaving back,
smashed in his furious passage through the woods; and high upon his neck still
desperately clung a tiny figure – the body of a mighty warrior, a giant among the
Swertings.
 On the great beast thundered, blundering in blind wrath through pool and thicket.
Arrows skipped and snapped harmlessly about the triple hide of his flanks. Men of
both sides fled before him, but many he overtook and crushed to the ground. Soon
he was lost to view, still trumpeting and stamping far away. What became of him
Sam never heard: whether he escaped to roam the wild for a time, until he perished
far from his home or was trapped in some deep pit; or whether he raged on until he
plunged in the Great River and was swallowed up.
 Sam drew a deep breath. 'An Oliphaunt it was!' he said. 'So there are Oliphaunts,
and I have seen one. What a life! But no one at home will ever believe me. Well, if
that's over, I'll have a bit of sleep.'
 'Sleep while you may,' said Mablung. 'But the Captain will return, if he is unhurt;
and when he comes we shall depart swiftly. We shall be pursued as soon as news of
our deed reaches the Enemy, and that will not be long.'
 'Go quietly when you must!' said Sam. 'No need to disturb my sleep. I was walking
all night.'
 Mablung laughed. 'I do not think the Captain will leave you here, Master Samwise,'
he said. 'But you shall see.'
